ABASE
Definition: to humiliate, degrade
Synonym: embarrass
Sentence: After being overthrown and abased, the deposed leader offered to bow down to his conqueror.

ABASH
Definition: embarrass
Synonym: humiliate
Sentence: The public criticism abashed the young speaker.

ABATE
Definition: to reduce, lessen
Synonym: decrease, diminish
Sentence: The rain poured down for a while, then abated.

ABDICATE
Definition: to give up a position, usually one of leadership; to relinquish, especially a throne
Synonym: renounce, resign
Sentence: When he realized that the revolutionaries would surely win, the king abdicated his throne.

ABDUCT
Definition: to kidnap, take by force (lead away)
Synonym: kidnap
Sentence: The evildoers abducted the fairy princess from her happy home.

ABERRATION
Definition: something that differs from the norm
Synonym: anomaly, deviation
Sentence: In 1918, the Boston Red Sox won the World Series, but the success turned out to be an aberration, and the Red Sox have not won a World Series since.

ABET
Definition: to aid, help, encourage
Synonym: assist
Sentence: The spy succeeded only because he had a friend on the inside to abet him.

ABHOR
Definition: to hate, detest
Synonym: loathe
Sentence: Because he always wound up kicking himself in the head when he tried to play soccer, Oswald began to abhor the sport.

ABIDE
Definition: (1) to put up with (2) to remain
Synonym: tolerate, endure
Sentence: Though he did not agree with the decision, Chuck decided to abide by it.

ABJECT
Definition: wretched, pitiful
Synonym: miserable
Sentence: After losing all her money, falling into a puddle, and breaking her ankle, Eloise was abject.

ABJURE
Definition: to reject, renounce
Synonym: repudiate
Sentence: To prove his honesty, the President abjured the evil policies of his wicked predecessor.

ABNEGATION
Definition: denial of comfort to oneself
Synonym: self-denial
Sentence: The holy man slept on the floor, took only cold showers, and generally followed other practices of abnegation.

ABORT
Definition: to give up on a half-finished project or effort
Synonym: terminate
Sentence: After they ran out of food, the men, attempting to jump rope around the world, had to abort and go home.

ABRIDGE
Definition: (1) to cut down, shorten (2) shortened
Synonym: condense
Sentence: The publisher thought the dictionary was too long and abridged it.

ABROGATE
Definition: to abolish, usually by authority
Synonym: repeal
Sentence: The Bill of Rights assures that the government cannot abrogate our right to a free press.

ABSCOND
Definition: to sneak away and hide
Synonym: flee
Sentence: In the confusion, the super-spy absconded into the night with the secret plans.

ABSOLUTION
Definition: freedom from blame, guilt, sin
Synonym: forgiveness
Sentence: Once all the facts were known, the jury gave Angela absolution by giving a verdict of not guilty.

ABSTAIN
Definition: to freely choose not to commit an action; to refrain
Synonym: refrain
Sentence: Everyone demanded that Angus put on the kilt, but he did not want to do it and abstained.

ABSTEMIOUS
Definition: moderate, restrained (related to abstain)
Synonym: temperate
Sentence: The abstemious monk ate sparingly.

ABSTRUSE
Definition: hard to comprehend
Synonym: obscure
Sentence: Everyone else in the class understood geometry easily, but John found the subject abstruse.

ACCEDE
Definition: to agree; to go along with, accept
Synonym: consent
Sentence: When the class asked the teacher whether they could play baseball instead of learn grammar they expected him to refuse, but instead he acceded to their request.

ACCENTUATE
Definition: to stress, highlight
Synonym: emphasize
Sentence: Psychologists agree that those people who are happiest accentuate the positive in life.

ACCESSIBLE
Definition: obtainable, reachable
Synonym: available
Sentence: After studying with SparkNotes and getting a great score on the SAT, Marlena happily realized that her goal of getting into an Ivy-League college was accessible.

ACCLAIM
Definition: high praise
Synonym: applause, commendation
Sentence: Greg's excellent poem won the acclaim of his friends.

ACCOLADE
Definition: high praise, special distinction
Synonym: honor
Sentence: Everyone offered accolades to Sam after he won the Noble Prize.

ACCOMMODATING
Definition: helpful, obliging, polite
Synonym: agreeable
Sentence: Though the apartment was not big enough for three people, Arnold, Mark, and Zebulon were all friends and were accommodating to each other.

ACCORD
Definition: an agreement
Synonym: harmony
Sentence: After much negotiating, England and Iceland finally came to a mutually beneficial accord about fishing rights off the cost of Greenland.

ACCOST
Definition: to confront verbally
Synonym: approach
Sentence: Though Antoinette was normally quite calm, when the waiter spilled soup on her for the fourth time in 15 minutes she stood up and accosted the man.

ACCRETION
Definition: slow growth in size or amount
Synonym: accumulation
Sentence: Stalactites are formed by the accretion of minerals from the roofs of caves.

ACERBIC
Definition: biting, bitter in tone or taste; sharp
Synonym: caustic, acid
Sentence: Jill became extremely acerbic and began to cruelly make fun of all her friends.

ACQUIESCE
Definition: to agree without protesting; to go along with, accept
Synonym: consent, comply
Sentence: Though Mr. Correlli wanted to stay outside and work in his garage, when his wife told him that he had better come in to dinner, he acquiesced to her demands.

ACRID
Definition: bitter
Synonym: sharp, harsh
Sentence: The acrid smell of smoke filled the room.

ACRIMONY
Definition: bitterness, discord
Synonym: hostility
Sentence: Though they vowed that no girl would ever come between them, Biff and Trevor could not keep acrimony from overwhelming their friendship after they both fell in love with the lovely Teresa.

ACUMEN
Definition: keen insight; sharp, intense, perceptive ability
Synonym: shrewdness
Sentence: Because of his mathematical acumen, Larry was able to figure out in minutes problems that took other students hours.

ACUTE
Definition: (1) sharp, severe (2) having keen insight
Synonym: intense, perceptive
Sentence: Arnold could not walk because the pain in his foot was so acute.

ACUITY
Definition: sharpness, keenness of perception
Synonym: acuteness
Sentence: Her visual acuity allowed her to spot details others missed.

ADAMANT
Definition: impervious, immovable, unyielding; stubborn, uncompromising
Synonym: inflexible
Sentence: Though public pressure was intense, the President remained adamant about his proposal.

ADEPT
Definition: extremely skilled
Synonym: proficient, skillful
Sentence: Tarzan was adept at jumping from tree to tree like a monkey.

ADHERE
Definition: (1) to stick to something (2) to follow devoutly
Synonym: cling
Sentence: We adhered the poster to the wall with tape.

ADMONISH
Definition: to caution, criticize, reprove
Synonym: warn, reprimand
Sentence: Joe's mother admonished him not to ruin his appetite by eating cookies before dinner.

ADORN
Definition: to decorate
Synonym: embellish
Sentence: We adorned the tree with ornaments.

ADROIT
Definition: skillful, dexterous
Synonym: deft, clever
Sentence: The adroit thief could pick someone's pocket without attracting notice.

ADULATION
Definition: extreme praise
Synonym: flattery
Sentence: Though the book was pretty good, Marcy did not believe it deserved the adulation it received.

ADULTERATE
Definition: to water down, corrupt, dilute, make impure
Synonym: contaminate
Sentence: The company adulterated the juice with water to increase profits.

ADUMBRATE
Definition: to sketch out in a vague way
Synonym: outline
Sentence: The coach adumbrated a game plan, but none of the players knew precisely what to do.

ADVERSE
Definition: antagonistic, unfavorable, dangerous; hostile, opposed to, difficult
Synonym: harmful
Sentence: Because of adverse conditions, the hikers decided to give up trying to climb the mountain.

ADVERSITY
Definition: difficult circumstances, hardship
Synonym: misfortune
Sentence: She showed great courage in the face of adversity.

ADVOCATE
Definition: (1) to argue in favor of something (2) a person who argues in favor of something
Synonym: support, champion
Sentence: Arnold advocated turning left at the stop sign, even though everyone else thought we should turn right.

AERIAL
Definition: somehow related to the air
Synonym: airborne
Sentence: We watched as the fighter planes conducted aerial maneuvers.

AESTHETIC
Definition: artistic, related to the appreciation of beauty
Synonym: artistic
Sentence: We hired Susan as our interior decorator because she has such a fine aesthetic sense.

AFFABLE
Definition: friendly, amiable
Synonym: pleasant, genial
Sentence: People like to be around George because he is so affable and good-natured.

AFFECTED
Definition: fake or influenced
Synonym: artificial, pretentious
Sentence: Her affected British accent was unconvincing.

AFFINITY
Definition: a spontaneous feeling of closeness; a natural liking toward something or someone
Synonym: attraction
Sentence: Jerry didn't know why, but he felt an incredible affinity for Kramer the first time they met.

AFFLUENT
Definition: rich, wealthy
Synonym: prosperous
Sentence: Mrs. Grebelski was affluent, owning a huge house, three cars, and an island near Maine.

AFFRONT
Definition: an insult
Synonym: offense
Sentence: Bernardo was very touchy, and took any slight as an affront to his honor.

AGGRANDIZE
Definition: to increase or make greater
Synonym: enhance, enlarge
Sentence: Joseph always dropped the names of the famous people his father knew as a way to aggrandize his personal stature.

AGGREGATE
Definition: (1) a whole or total (2) to gather into a mass
Synonym: collective, total
Sentence: The three branches of the U.S. Government form an aggregate much more powerful than its individual parts.

AGGRIEVED
Definition: distressed, wronged, injured
Synonym: offended
Sentence: The foreman mercilessly overworked his aggrieved employees.

AGILE
Definition: quick, nimble
Synonym: nimble, lithe
Sentence: The dogs were too slow to catch the agile rabbit.

AGNOSTIC
Definition: believing that the existence of God cannot be proven or disproven
Synonym: skeptic
Sentence: Joey's parents are very religious, but he is agnostic.

AGRICULTURE
Definition: farming
Synonym: farming
Sentence: It was a huge step in the progress of civilization when tribes left hunting and gathering and began to develop more sustainable methods of obtaining food, such as agriculture.

AISLE
Definition: a passageway between rows of seats
Synonym: passage
Sentence: Once we got inside the stadium we walked down the aisle to our seats.

ALACRITY
Definition: eagerness, speed; cheerful speed
Synonym: enthusiasm
Sentence: For some reason, Chuck loved to help his mother whenever he could, so when his mother asked him to set the table he did so with alacrity.

ALIAS
Definition: a false name or identity
Synonym: pseudonym
Sentence: He snuck past the guards by using an alias and fake ID.

ALLAY
Definition: to soothe, ease; to soothe, alleviate, relieve fears
Synonym: calm, relieve
Sentence: The chairman of the Federal Reserve gave a speech to try to allay investors' fears about an economic downturn.

ALLEGE
Definition: to assert, usually without proof
Synonym: claim
Sentence: The policeman had alleged that Marshall committed the crime, but after the investigation turned up no evidence, Marshall was set free.

ALLEVIATE
Definition: to relieve, make more bearable
Synonym: ease
Sentence: This drug will alleviate the symptoms of the terrible disease, but only for a while.

ALLOCATE
Definition: to distribute, set aside
Synonym: assign
Sentence: The Mayor allocated 30 percent of the funds for improving the town's schools.

ALLUDE
Definition: to refer to
Synonym: hint, suggest
Sentence: She alluded to the problem without directly stating it.

ALOOF
Definition: reserved, distant
Synonym: detached
Sentence: The scientist could sometimes seem aloof, as if he didn't care about his friends or family, but really he was just thinking about quantum mechanics.

ALTERCATION
Definition: a dispute, fight
Synonym: argument
Sentence: Jason and Lionel blamed one another for the car accident, leading to an altercation.

ALTRUISTIC
Definition: unselfish
Synonym: selfless
Sentence: Her altruistic donation helped many families.

AMALGAM
Definition: combination
Synonym: mixture, blend
Sentence: The new policy was an amalgam of several different proposals.

AMALGAMATE
Definition: to bring together, unite; to combine, unify
Synonym: merge
Sentence: Because of his great charisma, the presidential candidate was able to amalgamate all democrats and republicans under his banner.

AMASS
Definition: to collect, gather (a mass of)
Synonym: accumulate
Sentence: He amassed a fortune through careful investments.

AMBIGUOUS
Definition: uncertain, variably interpretable; having two possible meanings; unclear, obscure
Synonym: vague
Sentence: Some people think Caesar married Cleopatra for her power, others believe he was charmed by her beauty. His actual reasons are ambiguous.

AMBIVALENT
Definition: having opposing feelings; uncertain, having mixed feelings, leaning both ways
Synonym: uncertain
Sentence: My feelings about Calvin are ambivalent because on one hand he is a loyal friend, but on the other, he is a cruel and vicious thief.

AMELIORATE
Definition: to improve, make better
Synonym: improve
Sentence: The tense situation was ameliorated when Sam proposed a solution everyone could agree upon.

AMENABLE
Definition: willing, compliant; agreeable, consenting
Synonym: agreeable
Sentence: Our father was amenable when we asked him to drive us to the farm so we could go apple picking.

AMENITY
Definition: an item that increases comfort
Synonym: convenience
Sentence: Bill Gates's house is stocked with so many amenities, he never has to do anything for himself.

AMIABLE
Definition: friendly
Synonym: affable, pleasant
Sentence: An amiable fellow, Harry got along with just about everyone.

AMICABLE
Definition: friendly
Synonym: cordial
Sentence: Claudia and Jimmy got divorced, but amicably and without hard feelings.

AMOROUS
Definition: showing love, particularly sexual
Synonym: romantic
Sentence: Whenever Albert saw Mariah wear her slinky red dress, he began to feel quite amorous.

AMORPHOUS
Definition: without definite shape or type
Synonym: shapeless
Sentence: The effort was doomed from the start, because the reasons behind it were so amorphous and hard to pin down.

ANACHRONISTIC
Definition: being out of correct chronological order
Synonym: outdated
Sentence: In this book you're writing, you say that the Pyramids were built after the Titanic sank, which is anachronistic.

ANALGESIC
Definition: something that reduces pain
Synonym: painkiller
Sentence: Put this analgesic on the wound so that the poor man at least feels a little better.

ANALOGOUS
Definition: similar to, so that an analogy can be drawn
Synonym: comparable
Sentence: Though they are unrelated genetically, the bone structure of whales and fish is quite analogous.

ANARCHIST
Definition: one who wants to eliminate all government
Synonym: rebel
Sentence: An anarchist, Carmine wanted to dissolve every government everywhere.

ANARCHY
Definition: chaos, disorder
Synonym: lawlessness
Sentence: The country fell into anarchy after the revolution.

ANATHEMA
Definition: a cursed, detested person
Synonym: curse
Sentence: I never want to see that murderer. He is an anathema to me.

ANECDOTE
Definition: a short, humorous account
Synonym: story
Sentence: After dinner, Marlon told an anecdote about the time he got his nose stuck in a toaster.

ANESTHESIA
Definition: loss of sensation
Synonym: numbness
Sentence: When the nerves in his spine were damaged, Mr. Hollins suffered anesthesia in his legs.

ANGUISH
Definition: extreme sadness, torment
Synonym: agony
Sentence: Angelos suffered terrible anguish when he learned that Buffy had died while combating a strange mystical force of evil.

ANIMATED
Definition: lively
Synonym: energetic
Sentence: When he begins to talk about drama, which is his true passion, he becomes very animated.

ANIMOSITY
Definition: hostility; ill will, hatred
Synonym: hatred
Sentence: There was great animosity between the rival teams.

ANNEX
Definition: (1) to incorporate territory or space (2) a room attached to a larger room or space
Synonym: attach
Sentence: After defeating them in battle, the Russians annexed Poland.

ANNUL
Definition: to make void or invalid
Synonym: cancel, nullify
Sentence: After seeing its unforeseen and catastrophic effects, Congress sought to annul the law.

ANOMALY
Definition: something that does not fit into the normal order; out of place
Synonym: irregularity, aberration
Sentence: That rip in the space-time continuum is certainly a spatial anomaly.

ANOMALOUS
Definition: unusual, irregular
Synonym: abnormal
Sentence: The anomalous test results puzzled the scientists.

ANONYMOUS
Definition: being unknown, unrecognized
Synonym: unnamed
Sentence: Mary received a love poem from an anonymous admirer.

ANTAGONISM
Definition: hostility
Synonym: enmity
Sentence: Superman and Bizarro Superman shared a mutual antagonism, and often fought.

ANTECEDENT
Definition: something that came before
Synonym: predecessor
Sentence: The great tradition of Western culture had its antecedent in the culture of Ancient Greece.

ANTEDILUVIAN
Definition: ancient
Synonym: prehistoric
Sentence: The antediluvian man still believed that Eisenhower was president of the United States and that hot dogs cost a nickel.

ANTHOLOGY
Definition: a selected collection of writings, songs, etc.
Synonym: collection
Sentence: The new anthology of Bob Dylan songs contains all his greatest hits and a few songs that you might never have heard before.

ANTIPATHY
Definition: a strong dislike, repugnance; dislike, ill will
Synonym: aversion
Sentence: I know you love me, but because you are a liar and a thief, I feel nothing but antipathy for you.

ANTIQUATED
Definition: old, out of date
Synonym: obsolete
Sentence: That antiquated car has none of the features, like power windows and steering, that make modern cars so great.

ANTISEPTIC
Definition: clean, sterile
Synonym: sanitary
Sentence: The antiseptic hospital was very bare, but its cleanliness helped to keep patients healthy.

ANTITHESIS
Definition: the absolute opposite
Synonym: opposite
Sentence: Your values, which hold war and violence in the highest esteem, are the antithesis of my pacifist beliefs.

ANXIETY
Definition: intense uneasiness
Synonym: worry
Sentence: When he heard about the car crash, he felt anxiety because he knew that his girlfriend had been driving on the road where the accident occurred.

APATHETIC
Definition: lacking concern, emotion
Synonym: indifferent
Sentence: Uninterested in politics, Bruno was apathetic about whether he lived under a capitalist or communist regime.

APEX
Definition: peak, tip, acme
Synonym: summit, pinnacle
Sentence: The climbers finally reached the apex of the mountain.

APOCRYPHAL
Definition: fictitious, false, wrong
Synonym: dubious
Sentence: Because I am standing before you, it seems obvious that the stories circulating about my demise were apocryphal.

APPALLING
Definition: inspiring shock, horror, disgust
Synonym: shocking
Sentence: The judge found the murderer's crimes and lack of remorse appalling.

APPEASE
Definition: to calm, satisfy; to soothe, placate, assuage
Synonym: pacify, placate
Sentence: When the child cries, the mother gives him candy to appease him.

APPRAISE
Definition: to assess the worth or value of
Synonym: evaluate
Sentence: A realtor will come over tonight to appraise our house.

APPREHEND
Definition: (1) to seize, arrest (2) to perceive, understand, grasp
Synonym: arrest, understand
Sentence: The criminal was apprehended at the scene.

APPROBATION
Definition: praise
Synonym: approval
Sentence: The crowd welcomed the heroes with approbation.

APPROPRIATE
Definition: to take, make use of
Synonym: seize
Sentence: The government appropriated the farmer's land without justification.

AQUATIC
Definition: relating to water
Synonym: marine
Sentence: The marine biologist studies starfish and other aquatic creatures.

ARABLE
Definition: suitable for growing crops
Synonym: farmable
Sentence: The farmer purchased a plot of arable land on which he will grow corn and sprouts.

ARBITER
Definition: one who can resolve a dispute, make a decision
Synonym: judge
Sentence: The divorce court judge will serve as the arbiter between the estranged husband and wife.

ARBITRARY
Definition: based on factors that appear random
Synonym: random
Sentence: The boy's decision to choose one college over another seems arbitrary.

ARBITRATION
Definition: the process or act of resolving a dispute
Synonym: mediation
Sentence: The employee sought official arbitration when he could not resolve a disagreement with his supervisor.

ARBOREAL
Definition: of or relating to trees
Synonym: tree-related
Sentence: Leaves, roots, and bark are a few arboreal traits.

ARCANE
Definition: obscure, secret, known only by a few; understood by few, mysterious
Synonym: mysterious
Sentence: The professor is an expert in arcane Lithuanian literature.

ARCHAIC
Definition: of or relating to an earlier period in time, outdated
Synonym: ancient
Sentence: In a few select regions of Western Mongolian, an archaic Chinese dialect is still spoken.

ARCHETYPAL
Definition: the most representative or typical example of something
Synonym:典型的
Sentence: Some believe George Washington, with his flowing white hair and commanding stature, was the archetypal politician.

ARDENT
Definition: passionate, enthusiastic
Synonym: fervent
Sentence: She was an ardent supporter of the cause.

ARDOR
Definition: extreme vigor, energy, enthusiasm
Synonym: passion
Sentence: The soldiers conveyed their ardor with impassioned battle cries.

ARDUOUS
Definition: difficult
Synonym: laborious, hard
Sentence: The arduous climb exhausted even experienced hikers.

ARID
Definition: excessively dry; dry, desiccated
Synonym: parched
Sentence: Little other than palm trees and cacti grow successfully in arid environments.

ARROGATE
Definition: to take without justification
Synonym: usurp
Sentence: The king arrogated the right to order executions to himself exclusively.

ARTIFACT
Definition: a remaining piece from an extinct culture or place
Synonym: relic
Sentence: The scientists spent all day searching the cave for artifacts from the ancient Mayan civilization.

ARTISAN
Definition: a craftsman
Synonym: craftsperson
Sentence: The artisan uses wood to make walking sticks.

ASCERTAIN
Definition: to perceive, learn
Synonym: determine
Sentence: With a bit of research, the student ascertained that some plants can live for weeks without water.

ASCETIC
Definition: practicing restraint as a means of self-discipline, usually religious; tough, austere, without luxuries, hermit-like, self-denying
Synonym: austere
Sentence: The priest lives an ascetic life devoid of television, savory foods, and other pleasures.

ASCRIBE
Definition: to assign, credit, attribute to
Synonym: attribute
Sentence: Some ascribe the invention of fireworks and dynamite to the Chinese.

ASPERSION
Definition: a curse, expression of ill-will
Synonym: slander
Sentence: The rival politicians repeatedly cast aspersions on each others' integrity.

ASPIRE
Definition: to long for, aim toward
Synonym: strive
Sentence: The young poet aspires to publish a book of verse someday.

ASSAIL
Definition: to attack
Synonym: assault
Sentence: At dawn, the war planes assailed the boats in the harbor.

ASSESS
Definition: to evaluate
Synonym: appraise
Sentence: A crew arrived to assess the damage after the crash.

ASSIDUOUS
Definition: hard-working, diligent; determined, diligent
Synonym: diligent
Sentence: The construction workers erected the skyscraper during two years of assiduous labor.

ASSUAGE
Definition: to ease, pacify; to calm, make better
Synonym: soothe, relieve
Sentence: The mother held the baby to assuage its fears.

ASTUTE
Definition: very clever, crafty; perceptive, intelligent
Synonym: shrewd
Sentence: Much of Roger's success in politics results from his ability to provide astute answers to reporters' questions.

ASYLUM
Definition: (1) a place of refuge, protection, a sanctuary (2) an institution in which the insane are kept
Synonym: refuge, sanctuary
Sentence: For Thoreau, the forest served as an asylum from the pressures of urban life.

ATONE
Definition: to repent, make amends; to make up for, apologize
Synonym: make amends
Sentence: The man atoned for forgetting his wife's birthday by buying her five dozen roses.

ATROPHY
Definition: to wither away, decay; to wither, waste away from lack of use
Synonym: decay
Sentence: If muscles do not receive enough blood, they will soon atrophy and die.

ATTAIN
Definition: to achieve, arrive at
Synonym: achieve
Sentence: The athletes strived to attain their best times in competition.

ATTRIBUTE
Definition: (1) to credit, assign (2) a facet or trait
Synonym: quality, characteristic
Sentence: He attributes all of his success to his mother's undying encouragement.

ATYPICAL
Definition: not typical, unusual
Synonym: unusual
Sentence: Screaming and crying is atypical adult behavior.

AUDACIOUS
Definition: excessively bold
Synonym: bold, daring
Sentence: The security guard was shocked by the fan's audacious attempt to offer him a bribe.

AUDACITY
Definition: boldness, brashness
Synonym: boldness
Sentence: She had the audacity to interrupt the meeting.

AUDIBLE
Definition: able to be heard
Synonym: hearable
Sentence: The missing person's shouts were unfortunately not audible.

AUGMENT
Definition: to add to, expand; to add to, increase, make bigger
Synonym: increase
Sentence: The eager student seeks to augment his knowledge of French vocabulary by reading French literature.

AUGUST
Definition: venerable, awe-inspiring, noble
Synonym: majestic
Sentence: The august ceremony impressed all who attended.

AUSPICIOUS
Definition: favorable, indicative of good things; good, positive
Synonym: favorable
Sentence: The tennis player considered the sunny forecast an auspicious sign that she would win her match.

AUSTERE
Definition: very bare, bleak; stern, harsh
Synonym: stark
Sentence: The austere furniture inside the abandoned house made the place feel haunted.

AVARICE
Definition: excessive greed; greed
Synonym: greed
Sentence: The banker's avarice led him to amass a tremendous personal fortune.

AVENGE
Definition: to seek revenge
Synonym: retaliate
Sentence: The victims will take justice into their own hands and strive to avenge themselves against the men who robbed them.

AVERSION
Definition: a particular dislike for something
Synonym: dislike
Sentence: Because he's from Hawaii, Ben has an aversion to autumn, winter, and cold climates in general.

AVERT
Definition: to avoid
Synonym: prevent
Sentence: Quick action averted disaster.

BALK
Definition: to stop, block abruptly; to hesitate, refuse to move, resist
Synonym: refuse
Sentence: Edna's boss balked at her request for another raise.

BALLAD
Definition: a love song
Synonym: song
Sentence: Greta's boyfriend played her a ballad on the guitar during their walk through the dark woods.

BANAL
Definition: dull, commonplace; common, ordinary, dull, prosaic, pedestrian
Synonym: trite
Sentence: The client rejected our proposal because they found our presentation banal and unimpressive.

BANE
Definition: a burden; something that harms, poison
Synonym: curse
Sentence: Advanced physics is the bane of many students' academic lives.

BARD
Definition: a poet, often a singer as well
Synonym: poet
Sentence: Shakespeare is often considered the greatest bard in the history of the English language.

BASE
Definition: low, vile
Synonym: despicable
Sentence: His base motives were eventually exposed.

BASHFUL
Definition: shy, excessively timid
Synonym: timid
Sentence: Frankie's mother told him not to be bashful when he refused to attend the birthday party.

BATTERY
Definition: (1) a device that supplies power (2) assault, beating
Synonym: assault
Sentence: Her husband was accused of assault and battery after he attacked a man on the sidewalk.

BAWDY
Definition: obscene, indecent
Synonym: lewd
Sentence: The comedy show featured bawdy humor.

BEGUILE
Definition: to trick, deceive
Synonym: deceive
Sentence: The thief beguiled his partners into surrendering all of their money to him.

BEHEMOTH
Definition: something of tremendous power or size
Synonym: giant
Sentence: The new aircraft carrier is among several behemoths that the Air Force has added to its fleet.

BELLIGERENT
Definition: eager to fight; hostile, aggressive
Synonym: hostile
Sentence: The belligerent nation threatened war.

BENEFACTOR
Definition: helper, generous person
Synonym: patron
Sentence: The anonymous benefactor donated millions to the university.

BENEVOLENT
Definition: marked by goodness or doing good; kind, generous
Synonym: kind
Sentence: Police officers should be commended for their benevolent service to the community.

BENIGN
Definition: favorable, not threatening, mild; good, kindly
Synonym: harmless
Sentence: We were all relieved to hear that the medical tests determined her tumor to be benign.

BEQUEATH
Definition: to pass on, give
Synonym: leave
Sentence: Jon's father bequeathed his entire estate to his mother.

BERATE
Definition: to scold vehemently
Synonym: scold
Sentence: The angry boss berated his employees for failing to meet their deadline.

BEREFT
Definition: devoid of, without
Synonym: deprived
Sentence: His family was bereft of food and shelter following the tornado.

BESEECH
Definition: to beg, plead, implore
Synonym: implore
Sentence: The servant beseeched the king for food to feed his starving family.

BIAS
Definition: a tendency, inclination, prejudice
Synonym: prejudice
Sentence: The judge's hidden bias against smokers led him to make an unfair decision.

BIASED
Definition: prejudiced, unfair
Synonym: partial
Sentence: The biased reporter only presented one side of the story.

BILK
Definition: to cheat, defraud
Synonym: swindle
Sentence: The lawyer discovered that this firm had bilked several clients out of thousands of dollars.

BLAND
Definition: too plain, inoffensive
Synonym: dull
Sentence: The bland meal needed more seasoning.

BLANDISH
Definition: to coax by using flattery
Synonym: flatter
Sentence: Rachel's assistant tried to blandish her into accepting the deal.

BLASPHEMOUS
Definition: insulting to religion or God, irreverent, heretical
Synonym: sacrilegious
Sentence: The blasphemous statement offended many believers.

BLEMISH
Definition: an imperfection, flaw
Synonym: flaw
Sentence: The dealer agreed to lower the price because of the many blemishes on the surface of the wooden furniture.

BLIGHT
Definition: (1) a plague, disease (2) something that destroys hope
Synonym: affliction
Sentence: The potato blight destroyed the harvest and bankrupted many families.

BLIGHTED
Definition: sick, damaged, ruined
Synonym: damaged
Sentence: The blighted crops could not be saved.

BLITHE
Definition: happy, cheerful
Synonym: carefree
Sentence: She maintained a blithe attitude despite the difficulties.

BOGUS
Definition: fake, worthless
Synonym: counterfeit
Sentence: The bogus document was quickly identified.

BOISTEROUS
Definition: loud and full of energy
Synonym: rowdy
Sentence: The candidate won the vote after giving several boisterous speeches on television.

BOMBASTIC
Definition: excessively confident, pompous
Synonym: pompous
Sentence: The singer's bombastic performance disgusted the crowd.

BOON
Definition: a gift or blessing
Synonym: benefit
Sentence: The good weather has been a boon for many businesses located near the beach.

BOURGEOIS
Definition: a middle-class person, capitalist
Synonym: middle-class
Sentence: Many businessmen receive criticism for their bourgeois approach to life.

BRAVADO
Definition: false bravery, loud bragging
Synonym: swagger
Sentence: His bravado masked his true fear.

BRAZEN
Definition: excessively bold, brash; shameless, loud, inappropriately bold
Synonym: bold
Sentence: Critics condemned the novelist's brazen attempt to plagiarize Hemingway's story.

BRUSQUE
Definition: short, abrupt, dismissive; brief, curt, gruff, discourteous
Synonym: curt
Sentence: The captain's brusque manner offended the passengers.

BUFFET
Definition: (1) to strike with force (2) an arrangement of food set out on a table
Synonym: strike
Sentence: The strong winds buffeted the ships, threatening to capsize them.

BURNISH
Definition: to polish, shine
Synonym: polish
Sentence: His mother asked him to burnish the silverware before setting the table.

BUTTRESS
Definition: (1) to support, hold up (2) something that offers support
Synonym: support
Sentence: The column buttresses the roof above the statue.

CACOPHONY
Definition: tremendous noise, disharmonious sound; discordant, harsh-sounding
Synonym: discord
Sentence: The elementary school orchestra created a cacophony at the recital.

CADENCE
Definition: a rhythm, progression of sound
Synonym: rhythm
Sentence: The pianist used the foot pedal to emphasize the cadence of the sonata.

CAJOLE
Definition: to urge, coax; to persuade, urge
Synonym: coax
Sentence: Fred's buddies cajoled him into attending the bachelor party.

CALAMITY
Definition: an event with disastrous consequences
Synonym: disaster
Sentence: The earthquake in San Francisco was a calamity worse than any other natural disaster in history.

CALIBRATE
Definition: to set, standardize
Synonym: adjust
Sentence: The mechanic calibrated the car's transmission to make the motor run most efficiently.

CALLOW
Definition: young, naive, innocent, unfledged, inexperienced
Synonym: immature
Sentence: The callow youth lacked experience in the workforce.

CALLOUS
Definition: harsh, cold, unfeeling
Synonym: insensitive
Sentence: The murderer's callous lack of remorse shocked the jury.

CALUMNY
Definition: an attempt to spoil someone else's reputation by spreading lies
Synonym: slander
Sentence: The local official's calumny ended up ruining his opponent's prospect of winning the election.

CAMARADERIE
Definition: brotherhood, jovial unity
Synonym: fellowship
Sentence: Camaraderie among employees usually leads to success in business.

CANDID
Definition: honest, frank
Synonym: frank
Sentence: She appreciated his candid assessment of the situation.

CANDOR
Definition: honesty, frankness
Synonym: honesty
Sentence: We were surprised by the candor of the mayor's speech because he is usually rather evasive.

CANNY
Definition: shrewd, careful
Synonym: astute
Sentence: The canny runner hung at the back of the pack through much of the race to watch the other runners, and then sprinted past them at the end.

CANVAS
Definition: (1) a piece of cloth on which an artist paints (2) to cover, inspect
Synonym: fabric
Sentence: Picasso liked to work on canvas rather than on bare cement.

CAPACIOUS
Definition: very spacious
Synonym: roomy
Sentence: The workers delighted in their new capacious office space.

CAPITULATE
Definition: to surrender; to give up, give in
Synonym: surrender
Sentence: The army finally capitulated after fighting a long costly battle.

CAPRICIOUS
Definition: subject to whim, fickle; flighty, jumpy, moody, fickle
Synonym: unpredictable
Sentence: The young girl's capricious tendencies made it difficult for her to focus on achieving her goals.

CAPTIVATE
Definition: to get the attention of, hold
Synonym: charm
Sentence: The fireworks captivated the young boy, who had never seen such things before.

CARNAL
Definition: of the flesh, sexual
Synonym: sensual
Sentence: The monk struggled with carnal desires.

CAROUSE
Definition: to party, celebrate
Synonym: revel
Sentence: We caroused all night after getting married.

CARP
Definition: to annoy, pester
Synonym: complain
Sentence: The husband divorced his wife after listening to her carping voice for decades.

CASTIGATE
Definition: to admonish, punish, scold
Synonym: rebuke
Sentence: The teacher castigated the student for cheating.

CATALOG
Definition: (1) to list, enter into a list (2) a list or collection
Synonym: list
Sentence: The judge cataloged the victim's injuries before calculating how much money he would award.

CATALYZE
Definition: to charge, inspire
Synonym: stimulate
Sentence: The president's speech catalyzed the nation and resuscitated the economy.

CAUCUS
Definition: a meeting usually held by people working toward the same goal
Synonym: assembly
Sentence: The ironworkers held a caucus to determine how much of a pay increase they would request.

CAUSTIC
Definition: bitter, biting, acidic; biting, acidic, burning like acid or a sharp wit
Synonym: corrosive
Sentence: The politicians exchanged caustic insults for over an hour during the debate.

CAVORT
Definition: to leap about, behave boisterously
Synonym: frolic
Sentence: The adults ate their dinners on the patio, while the children cavorted around the pool.

CELIBATE
Definition: unmarried, refraining from sex
Synonym: chaste
Sentence: The priest took a vow to remain celibate.

CENSOR
Definition: to ban, take out, remove harmful passages
Synonym: suppress
Sentence: The government censored the controversial book.

CENSURE
Definition: (1) harsh criticism (2) to rebuke formally; to reprimand, criticize, blame
Synonym: condemn
Sentence: The frustrated teenager could not put up with anymore of her critical mother's censure.

CEREBRAL
Definition: related to the intellect
Synonym: intellectual
Sentence: The books we read in this class are too cerebral—they don't engage my emotions at all.

CHAGRIN
Definition: shame, embarrassment, regret
Synonym: dismay
Sentence: Much to her chagrin, she realized she had worn mismatched shoes.

CHAOS
Definition: absolute disorder
Synonym: disorder
Sentence: Mr. Thornton's sudden departure for the lavatory plunged his classroom into chaos.

CHARLATAN
Definition: fake, quack, fraud, a snake-oil salesman
Synonym: fraud
Sentence: The charlatan sold worthless medicine to desperate patients.

CHASTE
Definition: pure, unspoiled, like a virgin
Synonym: pure
Sentence: She maintained her chaste reputation.

CHASTEN
Definition: to punish, subdue, make feel guilty
Synonym: discipline
Sentence: The experience chastened him and made him more careful.

CHASTISE
Definition: to criticize severely; to scold, punish
Synonym: reprimand
Sentence: After being chastised by her peers for mimicking Britney Spears, Miranda dyed her hair black and affected a Gothic style.

CHERISH
Definition: to feel or show affection toward something
Synonym: treasure
Sentence: She continued to cherish her red plaid trousers, even though they had gone out of style and no longer fit her.

CHIDE
Definition: to voice disapproval
Synonym: scold
Sentence: Lucy chided Russell for his vulgar habits and sloppy appearance.

CHOREOGRAPHY
Definition: the arrangement of dances
Synonym: dance arrangement
Sentence: The plot of the musical was banal, but the choreography was stunning.

CHRONICLE
Definition: (1) a written history (2) to write a history
Synonym: record
Sentence: The library featured the newly updated chronicle of World War II.

CHRONOLOGICAL
Definition: arranged in order of time
Synonym: sequential
Sentence: Lionel carefully arranged the snapshots of his former girlfriends in chronological order, and then set fire to them.

CIRCUITOUS
Definition: roundabout
Synonym: indirect
Sentence: The bus's circuitous route took us through numerous outlying suburbs.

CIRCUMLOCUTION
Definition: indirect and wordy language
Synonym: wordiness
Sentence: The professor's habit of speaking in circumlocutions made it difficult to follow his lectures.

CIRCUMSCRIBED
Definition: marked off, bounded
Synonym: limited
Sentence: The children were permitted to play tag only within a carefully circumscribed area of the lawn.

CIRCUMSPECT
Definition: cautious; careful, cautious
Synonym: prudent
Sentence: Though I promised Rachel's father I would bring her home promptly by midnight, it would have been more circumspect not to have specified a time.

CIRCUMVENT
Definition: to get around; to find a way around
Synonym: evade
Sentence: The school's dress code forbidding navel-baring jeans was circumvented by the determined students, who were careful to cover up with long coats when administrators were nearby.

CLAIRVOYANT
Definition: able to perceive things that normal people cannot
Synonym: psychic
Sentence: Zelda's uncanny ability to detect my lies was nothing short of clairvoyant.

CLAMOR
Definition: (1) loud noise (2) to loudly insist
Synonym: uproar
Sentence: Each morning the birds outside my window make such a clamor that they wake me up.

CLANDESTINE
Definition: secret; hidden, secret, covert
Synonym: covert
Sentence: Announcing to her boyfriend that she was going to the gym, Sophie actually went to meet Joseph for a clandestine liaison.

CLEAVE
Definition: (1) to divide into parts (2) to stick together firmly
Synonym: split
Sentence: Following the scandalous disgrace of their leader, the entire political party cleaved into warring factions.

CLEMENCY
Definition: mercy
Synonym: leniency
Sentence: After he forgot their anniversary, Martin could only beg Maria for clemency.

CLERGY
Definition: members of Christian holy orders
Synonym: priesthood
Sentence: Though the villagers viewed the church rectory as quaint and charming, the clergy who lived there regarded it as a mildewy and dusty place that aggravated their allergies.

CLOYING
Definition: sickeningly sweet
Synonym: overly sweet
Sentence: Though Ronald was physically attractive, Maud found his constant compliments and solicitous remarks cloying.

COAGULATE
Definition: to thicken, clot; to thicken, stick together, congeal
Synonym: clot
Sentence: The top layer of the pudding had coagulated into a thick skin.

COALESCE
Definition: to fuse into a whole
Synonym: merge
Sentence: Gordon's ensemble of thrift-shop garments coalesced into a surprisingly handsome outfit.

COBBLER
Definition: a person who makes or repairs shoes
Synonym: shoemaker
Sentence: I had my neighborhood cobbler replace my worn-out leather soles with new ones.

COERCE
Definition: to make somebody do something by force or threat
Synonym: force
Sentence: The court decided that Vanilla Ice did not have to honor the contract because he had been coerced into signing it.

COGENT
Definition: intellectually convincing; makes sense, is reasonable, thoughtful
Synonym: convincing
Sentence: Irene's arguments in favor of abstinence were so cogent that I could not resist them.

COGNIZANT
Definition: aware, mindful
Synonym: conscious
Sentence: Jake avoided speaking to women in bars because he was cognizant of the fact that drinking impairs his judgment.

COHERENT
Definition: logically consistent, intelligible
Synonym: logical
Sentence: Renee could not figure out what Monroe had seen because he was too distraught to deliver a coherent statement.

COLLATERAL
Definition: (1) secondary (2) security for a debt
Synonym: security
Sentence: Divorcing my wife had the collateral effect of making me poor, as she was the only one of us with a job or money.

COLLOQUIAL
Definition: characteristic of informal conversation
Synonym: informal
Sentence: Adam's essay on sexual response in primates was marked down because it contained too many colloquial expressions.

COLLUSION
Definition: secret agreement, conspiracy
Synonym: conspiracy
Sentence: The three law students worked in collusion to steal the final exam.

COLOSSUS
Definition: a gigantic statue or thing
Synonym: giant
Sentence: For 56 years, the ancient city of Rhodes featured a colossus standing astride its harbor.

COMBUSTION
Definition: the act or process of burning
Synonym: burning
Sentence: The unexpected combustion of the prosecution's evidence forced the judge to dismiss the case against Ramirez.

COMMEND
Definition: to praise
Synonym: praise
Sentence: The teacher commended the student for excellent work.

COMMENDATION
Definition: a notice of approval or recognition
Synonym: honor
Sentence: Jared received a commendation from Linda, his supervisor, for his stellar performance.

COMMENSURATE
Definition: corresponding in size or amount
Synonym: proportionate
Sentence: Ahab selected a very long roll and proceeded to prepare a tuna salad sandwich commensurate with his enormous appetite.

COMMODIOUS
Definition: roomy
Synonym: spacious
Sentence: Holden invited the three women to join him in the back seat of the taxicab, assuring them that the car was quite commodious.

COMPLACENCY
Definition: self-satisfied ignorance of danger; self-satisfied, smug
Synonym: smugness
Sentence: Colin tried to shock his friends out of their complacency by painting a frightening picture of what might happen to them.

COMPELLING
Definition: forceful, demanding attention
Synonym: persuasive
Sentence: Eliot's speech was so compelling that Lenore accepted his proposal on the spot.

COMPENSATE
Definition: to make an appropriate payment for something
Synonym: reimburse
Sentence: Reginald bought Sharona a new dress to compensate her for the one he'd spilled his ice cream on.

COMPETENT
Definition: capable, able to do it
Synonym: capable
Sentence: She was competent in her field.

COMPLEMENT
Definition: to complete, make perfect
Synonym: complete
Sentence: Ann's scarf complements her blouse beautifully, making her seem fully dressed even though she isn't wearing a coat.

COMPLIANT
Definition: ready to adapt oneself to another's wishes
Synonym: obedient
Sentence: Sue had very strong opinions about what to do on a first date, and Ted was absolutely compliant.

COMPLICIT
Definition: being an accomplice in a wrongful act
Synonym: involved
Sentence: By keeping her daughter's affair a secret, Maddie became complicit in it.

COMPLIMENT
Definition: an expression of esteem or approval
Synonym: praise
Sentence: I blushed crimson when Emma gave me a compliment on my new haircut.

COMPLY
Definition: to go along with, obey
Synonym: obey
Sentence: Everyone complied with the new regulations.

COMPOUND
Definition: (1) to combine parts (2) a combination of different parts (3) a walled area containing a group of buildings
Synonym: mixture
Sentence: The difficulty of finding a fire escape amid the smoke was compounded with the dangers posed by the panicking crowds.

COMPREHENSIVE
Definition: including everything
Synonym: thorough
Sentence: She sent me a comprehensive list of the ingredients needed to cook rabbit soufflé.

COMPRESS
Definition: to apply pressure, squeeze together
Synonym: squeeze
Sentence: Lynn compressed her lips into a frown.

COMPUNCTION
Definition: distress caused by feeling guilty; regret
Synonym: remorse
Sentence: He felt compunction for the shabby way he'd treated her.

CONCEDE
Definition: to accept as valid
Synonym: admit
Sentence: Andrew had to concede that what his mother said about Diana made sense.

CONCILIATORY
Definition: friendly, agreeable
Synonym: appeasing
Sentence: I took Amanda's invitation to dinner as a very conciliatory gesture.

CONCISE
Definition: brief and direct in expression; short, brief, efficient in use of words
Synonym: succinct
Sentence: Gordon did not like to waste time, and his instructions to Brenda were nothing if not concise.

CONCOCT
Definition: to fabricate, make up
Synonym: devise
Sentence: She concocted the most ridiculous story to explain her absence.

CONCOMITANT
Definition: accompanying in a subordinate fashion
Synonym: accompanying
Sentence: His dislike of hard work carried with it a concomitant lack of funds.

CONCORD
Definition: harmonious agreement; peace, harmony
Synonym: harmony
Sentence: Julie and Harold began the evening with a disagreement, but ended it in a state of perfect concord.

CONCUR
Definition: to agree
Synonym: agree
Sentence: The committee members concurred on the decision.

CONDOLENCE
Definition: an expression of sympathy in sorrow
Synonym: sympathy
Sentence: Brian lamely offered his condolences on the loss of his sister's roommate's cat.

CONDONE
Definition: to pardon, deliberately overlook; to allow, accept
Synonym: excuse
Sentence: He refused to condone his brother's crime.

CONDUIT
Definition: a pipe or channel through which something passes
Synonym: channel
Sentence: The water flowed through the conduit into the container.

CONFECTION
Definition: a sweet, fancy food
Synonym: sweet
Sentence: We went to the mall food court and purchased a delicious confection.

CONFIDANT
Definition: a person entrusted with secrets
Synonym: trusted friend
Sentence: Shortly after we met, she became my chief confidant.

CONFLAGRATION
Definition: great fire
Synonym: inferno
Sentence: The conflagration consumed the entire building.

CONFLATE
Definition: to combine
Synonym: merge
Sentence: The two theories were conflated into one.

CONFLUENCE
Definition: a gathering together
Synonym: convergence
Sentence: A confluence of different factors made tonight the perfect night.

CONFORMIST
Definition: one who behaves the same as others
Synonym: follower
Sentence: Julian was such a conformist that he had to wait and see if his friends would do something before he would commit.

CONFOUND
Definition: to frustrate, confuse
Synonym: perplex
Sentence: MacGuyver confounded the policemen pursuing him by covering his tracks.

CONGEAL
Definition: to thicken into a solid
Synonym: solidify
Sentence: The sauce had congealed into a thick paste.

CONGENIAL
Definition: pleasantly agreeable
Synonym: friendly
Sentence: His congenial manner made him popular wherever he went.

CONGREGATION
Definition: a gathering of people, especially for religious services
Synonym: assembly
Sentence: The priest told the congregation that he would be retiring.

CONGRUITY
Definition: the quality of being in agreement; similarity
Synonym: agreement
Sentence: Bill and Veronica achieved a perfect congruity of opinion.

CONJECTURE
Definition: to guess, hypothesize
Synonym: speculation
Sentence: Without more evidence, we can only conjecture about what happened.

CONNIVE
Definition: to plot, scheme
Synonym: conspire
Sentence: She connived to get me to give up my vacation plans.

CONSECRATE
Definition: to dedicate something to a holy purpose
Synonym: sanctify
Sentence: Arvin consecrated his spare bedroom as a shrine to Christina.

CONSENSUS
Definition: an agreement of opinion
Synonym: agreement
Sentence: The jury was able to reach a consensus only after days of deliberation.

CONSIGN
Definition: to give something over to another's care
Synonym: entrust
Sentence: Unwillingly, he consigned his mother to a nursing home.

CONSOLIDATE
Definition: to join together, make united, strengthen
Synonym: unite
Sentence: The companies consolidated their operations.

CONSOLATION
Definition: an act of comforting
Synonym: comfort
Sentence: Darren found Alexandra's presence to be a consolation for his suffering.

CONSONANT
Definition: in harmony
Synonym: harmonious
Sentence: The singers' consonant voices were beautiful.

CONSPICUOUS
Definition: clearly visible
Synonym: obvious
Sentence: His absence from the meeting was conspicuous.

CONSTITUENT
Definition: an essential part
Synonym: component
Sentence: The most important constituent of her perfume is something called ambergris.

CONSTRAIN
Definition: to forcibly restrict
Synonym: restrict
Sentence: His belief in nonviolence constrained him from taking revenge on his attackers.

CONSTRUE
Definition: to interpret
Synonym: interpret
Sentence: He construed her throwing his clothes out the window as a signal that she wanted him to leave.

CONSUMMATE
Definition: to complete a deal; to complete a marriage ceremony through sexual intercourse
Synonym: complete
Sentence: Erica and Donald consummated their agreement in the executive boardroom.

CONSUMPTION
Definition: the act of consuming
Synonym: use
Sentence: Consumption of intoxicating beverages is not permitted on these premises.

CONTEMPORANEOUS
Definition: existing during the same time
Synonym: concurrent
Sentence: Though her novels do not feature the themes of Romanticism, Jane Austen's work was contemporaneous with that of Wordsworth and Byron.

CONTEMPT
Definition: disdain, scorn
Synonym: scorn
Sentence: He showed nothing but contempt for his critics.

CONTENTIOUS
Definition: having a tendency to quarrel or dispute; argumentative, competitive, hostile
Synonym: argumentative
Sentence: George's contentious personality made him unpopular with his classmates.

CONTIGUITY
Definition: nearness to, adjacence
Synonym: proximity
Sentence: The contiguity of the two properties made them ideal for development.

CONTIGUOUS
Definition: near, adjacent
Synonym: adjacent
Sentence: The two contiguous states shared a border.

CONTRAVENE
Definition: to contradict, oppose, violate
Synonym: violate
Sentence: Edwidge contravened his landlady's rule against overnight guests.

CONTRITE
Definition: penitent, eager to be forgiven; regretful
Synonym: remorseful
Sentence: Blake's contrite behavior made it impossible to stay angry at him.

CONTRIVE
Definition: to plan or invent with ingenuity
Synonym: devise
Sentence: She contrived a clever solution to the problem.

CONTUSION
Definition: bruise, injury
Synonym: bruise
Sentence: The contusions on his face suggested he'd been in a fight.

CONUNDRUM
Definition: puzzle, problem
Synonym: puzzle
Sentence: Interpreting Jane's behavior was a constant conundrum.

CONVENE
Definition: to call together
Synonym: assemble
Sentence: Jason convened his entire extended family for a discussion.

CONVENTION
Definition: (1) an assembly of people (2) a rule, custom
Synonym: custom
Sentence: The hotel was full because of the cattle-ranchers' convention.

CONVIVIAL
Definition: characterized by feasting, drinking, merriment
Synonym: festive
Sentence: The restaurant's convivial atmosphere put me immediately at ease.

CONVOLUTED
Definition: intricate, complicated
Synonym: complex
Sentence: Grace's story was so convoluted that I couldn't follow it.

COPIOUS
Definition: profuse, abundant; abundant
Synonym: plentiful
Sentence: Copious amounts of Snapple were imbibed in the cafeteria.

CORDIAL
Definition: warm, affectionate
Synonym: friendly
Sentence: His cordial greeting melted my anger at once.

CORONATION
Definition: the act of crowning
Synonym: crowning
Sentence: The new king's coronation occurred the day after his father's death.

CORPOREAL
Definition: relating to the body
Synonym: physical
Sentence: The ghost had no corporeal form.

CORPULENCE
Definition: extreme fatness
Synonym: obesity
Sentence: Henry's corpulence did not make him any less attractive to his charming, svelte wife.

CORROBORATE
Definition: to support with evidence; to conform, give support
Synonym: confirm
Sentence: Luke's seemingly outrageous claim was corroborated by witnesses.

CORROSIVE
Definition: having the tendency to erode or eat away
Synonym: erosive
Sentence: The effect of the chemical was highly corrosive.

CORRUGATE
Definition: to have ridges
Synonym: wrinkle
Sentence: The corrugated roof protected the building.

COSMOPOLITAN
Definition: sophisticated, worldly
Synonym: urbane
Sentence: Lloyd's education and upbringing were cosmopolitan, so he felt right at home among the powerful and learned.

COUNTERACT
Definition: to neutralize, make ineffective
Synonym: offset
Sentence: The antidote counteracted the effect of the poison.

COUP
Definition: (1) a brilliant, unexpected act (2) the overthrow of a government and assumption of authority
Synonym: takeover
Sentence: Alexander pulled off an amazing coup when he got a date with Cynthia by purposely getting hit by her car.

COVERT
Definition: secretly engaged in; hidden
Synonym: secret
Sentence: Nerwin waged a covert campaign against his enemies, while outwardly appearing to remain friendly.

COVET
Definition: to desire enviously
Synonym: crave
Sentence: I coveted Moses's house, wife, and car.

COY
Definition: shy, withdrawn, demure
Synonym: shy
Sentence: She gave him a coy smile.

CRAVEN
Definition: cowardly, fearful
Synonym: cowardly
Sentence: The craven soldier refused to fight.

CRAVE
Definition: to want strongly, desire, yearn for
Synonym: yearn
Sentence: She craved chocolate constantly.

CREDULOUS
Definition: believing; believing anything, easily deceived
Synonym: gullible
Sentence: The credulous tourists believed every story the guide told them.

CREDULITY
Definition: readiness to believe
Synonym: gullibility
Sentence: His credulity made him an easy target for con men.

CRESCENDO
Definition: a steady increase in intensity or volume
Synonym: climax
Sentence: The crescendo of the brass instruments gave the piece a patriotic feel.

CRITERIA
Definition: standards by which something is judged
Synonym: standards
Sentence: Among Mrs. Fields's criteria for good cookies are that they be moist and chewy.

CRYPTIC
Definition: mysterious, hard to figure out
Synonym: enigmatic
Sentence: The cryptic message puzzled everyone.

CULMINATION
Definition: the climax toward which something progresses
Synonym: climax
Sentence: The culmination of the couple's argument was the decision to divorce.

CULPABLE
Definition: deserving blame; guilty, at fault
Synonym: blameworthy
Sentence: He was culpable of the crime, and was sentenced to perform community service for 75 years.

CULTIVATE
Definition: to nurture, improve, refine
Synonym: develop
Sentence: At the library, she cultivated her interest in spy novels.

CUMULATIVE
Definition: increasing, building upon itself
Synonym: accumulating
Sentence: The cumulative effect of hours spent in the sun was a deep tan.

CUNNING
Definition: sly, clever at being deceitful
Synonym: crafty
Sentence: The general devised a cunning plan to surprise the enemy.

CUPIDITY
Definition: greed, strong desire; greed, very strong desire
Synonym: avarice
Sentence: His cupidity made him enter the abandoned gold mine despite the obvious dangers.

CURSORY
Definition: brief to the point of being superficial; quick, hasty
Synonym: hasty
Sentence: Late for the meeting, she cast a cursory glance at the agenda.

CURT
Definition: abruptly and rudely short
Synonym: brusque
Sentence: Her curt reply to my question made me realize that she was upset at me.

CURTAIL
Definition: to lessen, reduce
Synonym: reduce
Sentence: Since losing his job, he had to curtail his spending.

DAUNTING
Definition: intimidating, causing one to lose courage
Synonym: intimidating
Sentence: He kept delaying the daunting act of asking for a promotion.

DEARTH
Definition: a lack, scarcity; scarcity, lack of
Synonym: shortage
Sentence: An eager reader, she was dismayed by the dearth of classic books at the library.

DEBACLE
Definition: a disastrous failure, disruption
Synonym: fiasco
Sentence: The elaborately designed fireworks show turned into a debacle when the fireworks started firing in random directions.

DEBASE
Definition: to lower the quality or esteem of something; to lower, disgrace, defile, abase
Synonym: degrade
Sentence: The large raise that he gave himself debased his motives for running the charity.

DEBAUCH
Definition: to corrupt by means of sensual pleasures
Synonym: corrupt
Sentence: An endless amount of good wine and cheese debauched the traveler.

DEBILITATE
Definition: to weaken
Synonym: weaken
Sentence: The illness debilitated him for months.

DEBUNK
Definition: to expose the falseness of something
Synonym: disprove
Sentence: He debunked her claim to be the world's greatest chess player by defeating her in 18 consecutive matches.

DECOROUS
Definition: socially proper, appropriate
Synonym: proper
Sentence: The appreciative guest displayed decorous behavior toward his host.

DECRY
Definition: to criticize openly
Synonym: denounce
Sentence: The kind video rental clerk decried the policy of charging customers late fees.

DEFACE
Definition: to ruin or injure something's appearance
Synonym: vandalize
Sentence: The brothers used eggs and shaving cream to deface their neighbor's mailbox.

DEFAMATORY
Definition: harmful toward another's reputation
Synonym: slanderous
Sentence: The defamatory gossip spreading about the actor made the public less willing to see the actor's new movie.

DEFER
Definition: to postpone something; to yield to another's wisdom
Synonym: postpone
Sentence: Ron deferred to Diane, the expert on musical instruments, when he was asked about buying a piano.

DEFERENCE
Definition: show respect
Synonym: respect
Sentence: He showed deference to his elders.

DEFERENTIAL
Definition: showing respect for another's authority
Synonym: respectful
Sentence: His deferential attitude toward her made her more confident in her ability to run the company.

DEFT
Definition: skillful, capable; skillful, adroit, dexterous
Synonym: adroit
Sentence: Having worked in a bakery for many years, Marcus was a deft bread maker.

DEFUNCT
Definition: no longer used or existing; dead, pau
Synonym: obsolete
Sentence: They planned to turn the defunct schoolhouse into a community center.

DELEGATE
Definition: to hand over responsibility for something
Synonym: assign
Sentence: The dean delegated the task of finding a new professor to a special hiring committee.

DELETERIOUS
Definition: harmful
Synonym: harmful
Sentence: She experienced the deleterious effects of running a marathon without stretching her muscles enough beforehand.

DELIBERATE
Definition: intentional, reflecting careful consideration
Synonym: intentional
Sentence: Though Mary was quite upset, her actions to resolve the dispute were deliberate.

DELINEATE
Definition: to describe, outline, shed light on; to set boundaries, separate
Synonym: outline
Sentence: She neatly delineated her reasons for canceling the project's funding.

DEMAGOGUE
Definition: a leader who appeals to a people's prejudices
Synonym: rabble-rouser
Sentence: The demagogue strengthened his hold over his people by blaming immigrants for the lack of jobs.

DEMARCATE
Definition: to set boundaries, separate
Synonym: delimit
Sentence: The river demarcates the border between the two states.

DEMARCATION
Definition: the marking of boundaries or categories
Synonym: boundary
Sentence: Different cultures have different demarcations of good and evil.

DEMEAN
Definition: to lower the status or stature of something
Synonym: degrade
Sentence: She refused to demean her secretary by making him order her lunch.

DEMUR
Definition: to disagree, object, delay, hesitate
Synonym: object
Sentence: She demurred when asked to work overtime.

DEMURE
Definition: quiet, modest, reserved; modest, shy, coy
Synonym: modest
Sentence: Though everyone else at the party was dancing and going crazy, she remained demure.

DENIGRATE
Definition: to belittle, diminish the opinion of; to criticize, talk stink
Synonym: disparage
Sentence: The company decided that its advertisements would no longer denigrate the company's competitors.

DENOUNCE
Definition: to criticize publicly
Synonym: condemn
Sentence: The senator denounced her opponent as a greedy politician.

DEPLORE
Definition: to feel or express sorrow, disapproval
Synonym: lament
Sentence: We all deplored the miserable working conditions in the factory.

DEPRAVE
Definition: to make immoral
Synonym: corrupt
Sentence: The violent video games were accused of depraving young minds.

DEPRAVITY
Definition: wickedness; moral corruption
Synonym: corruption
Sentence: Rumors of the ogre's depravity made the children afraid to enter the forest.

DEPRECATE
Definition: to belittle, depreciate
Synonym: disparage
Sentence: Always over-modest, he deprecated his contribution to the local charity.

DERELICT
Definition: abandoned, run-down; abandoned or negligent
Synonym: neglectful
Sentence: Even though it was dangerous, the children enjoyed going to the deserted lot and playing in the derelict house.

DERELICTION
Definition: negligence, derelict in your duty
Synonym: neglect
Sentence: His dereliction of duty resulted in dismissal.

DERIDE
Definition: to laugh at mockingly, scorn
Synonym: mock
Sentence: The bullies derided the foreign student's accent.

DERIVATIVE
Definition: taken directly from a source, unoriginal
Synonym: unoriginal
Sentence: She was bored by his music because she felt that it was derivative and that she had heard it before.

DEROGATORY
Definition: negative, critical, disparaging
Synonym: disparaging
Sentence: He made derogatory comments about her work.

DESECRATE
Definition: to violate the sacredness of a thing or place
Synonym: profane
Sentence: They feared that the construction of a golf course would desecrate the preserved wilderness.

DESICCATE
Definition: to dry up, arid
Synonym: dehydrate
Sentence: The desiccated mummy had been preserved for thousands of years.

DESICCATED
Definition: dried up, dehydrated
Synonym: dried
Sentence: The skin of the desiccated mummy looked like old paper.

DESOLATE
Definition: deserted, dreary, lifeless
Synonym: barren
Sentence: She found the desolate landscape quite a contrast to the hustle and bustle of the overcrowded city.

DESPONDENT
Definition: feeling depressed, discouraged, hopeless
Synonym: dejected
Sentence: Having failed the first math test, the despondent child saw no use in studying for the next and failed that one too.

DESPOT
Definition: one who has total power and rules brutally
Synonym: tyrant
Sentence: The despot issued a death sentence for anyone who disobeyed his laws.

DESPICABLE
Definition: terrible, abhorrent, disgusting
Synonym: contemptible
Sentence: His despicable behavior shocked everyone.

DESTITUTE
Definition: impoverished, utterly lacking; poor
Synonym: impoverished
Sentence: The hurricane destroyed many homes and left many families destitute.

DESULTORY
Definition: lacking plan, purpose, or pattern, random
Synonym: random
Sentence: His desultory reading habits meant he never finished books.

DETER
Definition: to discourage, prevent from doing; to prevent, stop
Synonym: discourage
Sentence: Bob's description of scary snakes couldn't deter Marcia from traveling in the rainforests.

DETERRENT
Definition: something that prevents or discourages
Synonym: preventive
Sentence: The alarm system served as a deterrent to burglars.

DETRIMENT
Definition: harm, damage
Synonym: harm
Sentence: Smoking is a detriment to your health.

DETRIMENTAL
Definition: harmful
Synonym: damaging
Sentence: The scandal was detrimental to his career.

DEVIOUS
Definition: not straightforward, deceitful; deceitful, tricky
Synonym: cunning
Sentence: Not wanting to be punished, the devious girl blamed the broken vase on the cat.

DEXTERITY
Definition: skill
Synonym: skill
Sentence: Her manual dexterity made her an excellent surgeon.

DIALECT
Definition: a variation of a language
Synonym: vernacular
Sentence: In the country's remote, mountainous regions, the inhabitants spoke a dialect that the country's other inhabitants had difficulty understanding.

DIAPHANOUS
Definition: light, airy, transparent
Synonym: sheer
Sentence: Sunlight poured in through the diaphanous curtains, brightening the room.

DIDACTIC
Definition: (1) intended to instruct (2) overly moralistic; that which teaches, instructive
Synonym: instructive
Sentence: She wrote up a didactic document showing new employees how to handle the company's customers.

DIFFIDENT
Definition: shy, quiet, modest
Synonym: timid
Sentence: While eating dinner with the adults, the diffident youth did not speak for fear of seeming presumptuous.

DIFFUSE
Definition: (1) to scatter, thin out, break up (2) not concentrated, scattered, disorganized
Synonym: spread
Sentence: He diffused the tension in the room by making in a joke.

DILATORY
Definition: tending to delay, causing delay
Synonym: delaying
Sentence: The general's dilatory strategy enabled the enemy to regroup.

DILIGENT
Definition: showing care in doing one's work; hard-working
Synonym: industrious
Sentence: The diligent researcher made sure to check her measurements multiple times.

DIMINUTIVE
Definition: small or miniature
Synonym: tiny
Sentence: The bullies, tall and strong, picked on the diminutive child.

DIRE
Definition: dreadful, awful
Synonym: terrible
Sentence: The situation was dire and required immediate action.

DIRGE
Definition: a mournful song, especially for a funeral
Synonym: lament
Sentence: The bagpipers played a dirge as the casket was carried to the cemetery.

DISAFFECTED
Definition: rebellious, resentful of authority
Synonym: discontented
Sentence: Dismayed by Bobby's poor behavior, the parents sent their disaffected son to a military academy to be disciplined.

DISAVOW
Definition: to deny knowledge of or responsibility for
Synonym: deny
Sentence: Not wanting others to criticize her, she disavowed any involvement in the company's hiring scandal.

DISCERN
Definition: to perceive, detect; to see, distinguish one thing from another
Synonym: perceive
Sentence: Though he hid his emotions, she discerned from his body language that he was angry.

DISCLOSE
Definition: to reveal, make public
Synonym: reveal
Sentence: The CEO disclosed to the press that the company would have to fire several employees.

DISCOMFIT
Definition: to thwart, baffle
Synonym: embarrass
Sentence: The normally cheery and playful children's sudden misery discomfited the teacher.

DISCORD
Definition: disagreement, lack of harmony
Synonym: conflict
Sentence: The discord between the partners led to the dissolution of the business.

DISCORDANT
Definition: not agreeing, not in harmony with
Synonym: conflicting
Sentence: The girls' sobs were a discordant sound amid the general laughter that filled the restaurant.

DISCREET
Definition: careful
Synonym: prudent
Sentence: He was discreet about his personal affairs.

DISCREPANCY
Definition: difference, failure of things to correspond; inconsistency
Synonym: inconsistency
Sentence: He was troubled by the discrepancy between what he remembered paying for the appliance and what his receipt showed he paid for it.

DISCRETION
Definition: the quality of being reserved in speech or action; good judgment
Synonym: prudence
Sentence: Not wanting her patient to get overly anxious, the doctor used discretion in deciding how much to tell the patient about his condition.

DISCRIMINATE
Definition: to choose among, differentiate, select
Synonym: distinguish
Sentence: It's important to discriminate between facts and opinions.

DISCURSIVE
Definition: rambling, lacking order
Synonym: digressive
Sentence: The professor's discursive lectures seemed to be about every subject except the one initially described.

DISDAIN
Definition: scorn, hold in low esteem; scorn, contempt, intense dislike
Synonym: contempt
Sentence: After learning of his immoral actions, Justine held Lawrence in disdain.

DISGRUNTLED
Definition: upset, not content
Synonym: dissatisfied
Sentence: The child believed that his parents had unjustly grounded him, and remained disgruntled for a week.

DISHEARTENED
Definition: feeling a loss of spirit or morale
Synonym: discouraged
Sentence: The team was disheartened after losing in the finals of the tournament.

DISPARAGE
Definition: to criticize or speak ill of; to speak badly of, run down, talk stink
Synonym: belittle
Sentence: The saleswoman disparaged the competitor's products to persuade her customers to buy what she was selling.

DISPARATE
Definition: sharply differing, containing sharply contrasting elements
Synonym: dissimilar
Sentence: Having widely varying interests, the students had disparate responses toward the novel.

DISPARITY
Definition: state of being different, unequal
Synonym: difference
Sentence: The disparity in their incomes caused tension.

DISPATCH
Definition: to send off to accomplish a duty
Synonym: send
Sentence: The carpenter dispatched his assistant to fetch wood.

DISPEL
Definition: to drive away, scatter
Synonym: disperse
Sentence: She entered the office as usual on Monday, dispelling the rumor that she had been fired.

DISPERSE
Definition: to scatter, cause to scatter
Synonym: scatter
Sentence: When the rain began to pour, the crowd at the baseball game quickly dispersed.

DISREPUTE
Definition: a state of being held in low regard
Synonym: disgrace
Sentence: The officer fell into disrepute after it was learned that he had disobeyed the orders he had given to his own soldiers.

DISSEMBLE
Definition: to conceal, fake
Synonym: pretend
Sentence: Not wanting to appear heartlessly greedy, she dissembled and hid her intention to sell her ailing father's stamp collection.

DISSEMINATE
Definition: to spread widely; to distribute, spread out (like seeds)
Synonym: spread
Sentence: The politician disseminated his ideas across the town before the election.

DISSENT
Definition: (1) to disagree (2) the act of disagreeing
Synonym: disagree
Sentence: The principal argued that the child should repeat the fourth grade, but the unhappy parents dissented.

DISSIPATE
Definition: (1) to disappear, cause to disappear (2) to waste; to waste, disperse, spend
Synonym: disperse
Sentence: The sun finally came out and dissipated the haze.

DISSONANCE
Definition: lack of harmony or consistency
Synonym: discord
Sentence: Though the president of the company often spoke of the company as reliant solely upon its workers, her decision to increase her own salary rather than reward her employees revealed a striking dissonance between her alleged beliefs and her actions.

DISSUADE
Definition: to persuade someone not to do something
Synonym: discourage
Sentence: Worried that he would catch a cold, she tried to dissuade him from going out on winter nights.

DISTEND
Definition: to swell out
Synonym: expand
Sentence: Years of drinking beer caused his stomach to distend.

DISTRAUGHT
Definition: anxious, worried, disturbed, upset
Synonym: agitated
Sentence: She was distraught after hearing the bad news.

DITHER
Definition: to be indecisive
Synonym: waver
Sentence: Not wanting to offend either friend, he dithered about which of the two birthday parties he should attend.

DIVERSITY
Definition: variety, difference
Synonym: variety
Sentence: The company valued diversity in its workforce.

DIVINE
Definition: godly, exceedingly wonderful
Synonym: heavenly
Sentence: Terribly fond of desserts, she found the rich chocolate cake to be divine.

DIVISIVE
Definition: causing dissent, discord
Synonym: polarizing
Sentence: Her divisive tactics turned her two friends against each other.

DIVULGE
Definition: to reveal something secret
Synonym: disclose
Sentence: Pressured by the press, the government finally divulged the previously unknown information.

DOCILE
Definition: easily taught or trained
Synonym: obedient
Sentence: She successfully taught the docile puppy several tricks.

DOGMATIC
Definition: aggressively and arrogantly certain about unproved principles; stubbornly opinionated
Synonym: opinionated
Sentence: His dogmatic claim that men were better than women at fixing appliances angered everyone.

DORMANT
Definition: sleeping, temporarily inactive; sleepy, inactive
Synonym: inactive
Sentence: Though she pretended everything was fine, her anger lay dormant throughout the dinner party and exploded in screams of rage after everyone had left.

DOUR
Definition: stern, joyless; severe, stern
Synonym: grim
Sentence: The children feared their dour neighbor because the old man would take their toys if he believed they were being too loud.

DROLL
Definition: funny
Synonym: amusing
Sentence: His droll sense of humor kept everyone entertained.

DUBIOUS
Definition: doubtful, of uncertain quality
Synonym: questionable
Sentence: Suspicious that he was only trying to get a raise, she found his praise dubious.

DULY
Definition: properly
Synonym: appropriately
Sentence: The documents were duly signed and filed.

DUPE
Definition: to fool
Synonym: deceive
Sentence: She was duped into believing the false story.

DUPLICITY
Definition: crafty dishonesty
Synonym: deceit
Sentence: His duplicity involved convincing his employees to let him lower their salaries and increase their stock options, and then to steal the money he saved and run the company into the ground.

DURESS
Definition: hardship, threat
Synonym: coercion
Sentence: It was only under intense duress that he, who was normally against killing, fired his gun.

DYNAMIC
Definition: actively changing
Synonym: energetic
Sentence: The parents found it hard to keep up with the dynamic music scene with which their children had become very familiar.

EARNEST
Definition: sincere conviction
Synonym: sincere
Sentence: He spoke with earnest conviction about the importance of education.

EBULLIENT
Definition: bubbly, excited; extremely lively, enthusiastic
Synonym: exuberant
Sentence: She became ebullient upon receiving an acceptance letter from her first-choice college.

ECCENTRIC
Definition: different, odd, unusual, quirky
Synonym: unconventional
Sentence: The eccentric artist wore unusual clothing.

ECLECTIC
Definition: consisting of a diverse variety of elements
Synonym: diverse
Sentence: That bar attracts an eclectic crowd: lawyers, artists, circus clowns, and investment bankers.

ECSTATIC
Definition: intensely and overpoweringly happy
Synonym: elated
Sentence: The couple was ecstatic when they learned that they had won the lottery.

EDICT
Definition: an order, decree
Synonym: decree
Sentence: The ruler issued an edict requiring all of his subjects to bow down before him.

EFFACE
Definition: to wipe out, obliterate, rub away; to erase, rub out
Synonym: erase
Sentence: The husband was so angry at his wife for leaving him that he effaced all evidence of her presence; he threw out pictures of her and gave away all her belongings.

EFFERVESCENT
Definition: bubbly, lively
Synonym: bubbly
Sentence: My friend is so effervescent that she makes everyone smile.

EFFICACIOUS
Definition: effective
Synonym: effective
Sentence: My doctor promised me that the cold medicine was efficacious, but I'm still sniffling.

EFFRONTERY
Definition: impudence, nerve, insolence
Synonym: audacity
Sentence: When I told my aunt that she was boring, my mother scolded me for my effrontery.

EFFULGENT
Definition: radiant, splendorous
Synonym: radiant
Sentence: The golden palace was effulgent.

EGREGIOUS
Definition: extremely bad
Synonym: flagrant
Sentence: The student who threw sloppy joes across the cafeteria was punished for his egregious behavior.

ELABORATE
Definition: complex, detailed, intricate
Synonym: detailed
Sentence: Dan always beats me at chess because he develops such an elaborate game plan that I can never predict his next move.

ELATED
Definition: overjoyed, thrilled
Synonym: jubilant
Sentence: When she found out she had won the lottery, the writer was elated.

ELEGY
Definition: a speech given in honor of a dead person
Synonym: lament
Sentence: At the funeral, the widow gave a moving elegy describing her love for her husband.

ELICIT
Definition: to bring forth, draw out, evoke
Synonym: evoke
Sentence: Although I asked several times where the exit was, I elicited no response from the stone-faced policeman.

ELOQUENT
Definition: expressive, articulate, moving
Synonym: articulate
Sentence: The priest gave such an eloquent sermon that most churchgoers were crying.

ELUCIDATE
Definition: to clarify, explain
Synonym: clarify
Sentence: I didn't understand why my friend was so angry with me, so I asked Janine to elucidate her feelings.

ELUDE
Definition: to evade, escape
Synonym: escape
Sentence: Despite an intense search, the robber continues to elude the police.

EMACIATED
Definition: very thin, enfeebled looking; thin
Synonym: gaunt
Sentence: My sister eats a lot of pastries and chocolate but still looks emaciated.

EMANCIPATE
Definition: to free
Synonym: liberate
Sentence: The Emancipation Proclamation freed the slaves.

EMBELLISH
Definition: (1) to decorate, adorn (2) to add details to, enhance
Synonym: ornament
Sentence: My mom embellished the living room by adding lace curtains.

EMBEZZLE
Definition: to steal money by falsifying records
Synonym: steal
Sentence: The accountant was fired for embezzling \$10,000 of the company's funds.

EMEND
Definition: to correct or revise a written text
Synonym: correct
Sentence: If my sentence is incorrect, the editor will emend what I have written.

EMINENT
Definition: (1) distinguished, prominent, famous (2) conspicuous
Synonym: distinguished
Sentence: Mr. Phillips is such an eminent scholar that every professor on campus has come to hear him lecture.

EMOLLIENT
Definition: soothing
Synonym: soothing
Sentence: This emollient cream makes my skin very smooth.

EMOTE
Definition: to express emotion
Synonym: express
Sentence: The director told the actor he had to emote, or else the audience would have no idea what his character was going through.

EMPATHY
Definition: sensitivity to another's feelings as if they were one's own
Synonym: compassion
Sentence: I feel such empathy for my sister when she's in pain that I cry too.

EMPIRICAL
Definition: (1) based on observation or experience (2) capable of being proved or disproved by experiment; objective, observable
Synonym: experimental
Sentence: The scientist gathered empirical data on the growth rate of dandelions by studying the dandelions behind his house.

EMULATE
Definition: to imitate; to copy, imitate
Synonym: imitate
Sentence: I idolize Britney Spears so much that I emulate everything she does: I wear her outfits, sing along to her songs, and date a boy named Justin.

ENAMOR
Definition: to fill with love, fascinate, usually used in passive form followed by "of" or "with"
Synonym: captivate
Sentence: I grew enamored of that boy when he quoted my favorite love poem.

ENCORE
Definition: the audience's demand for a repeat performance; also the artist's performance in response to that demand
Synonym: repeat
Sentence: At the end of the concert, all the fans yelled, "Encore! Encore!" but the band did not come out to play again.

ENCUMBER
Definition: to weigh down, burden
Synonym: burden
Sentence: At the airport, my friend was encumbered by her luggage, so I offered to carry two of her bags.

ENGENDER
Definition: to bring about, create, generate; to create, give birth to, produce, generate
Synonym: create
Sentence: During the Olympics, the victories of U.S. athletes engender a patriotic spirit among Americans.

ENHANCE
Definition: to make better or greater, improve
Synonym: improve
Sentence: The new software enhances productivity.

ENIGMA
Definition: riddle, mystery
Synonym: puzzle
Sentence: The disappearance remained an enigma.

ENIGMATIC
Definition: mystifying, cryptic
Synonym: mysterious
Sentence: That man wearing the dark suit and dark glasses is so enigmatic that no one even knows his name.

ENERVATE
Definition: to weaken, exhaust
Synonym: weaken
Sentence: Writing these sentences enervates me so much that I will have to take a nap after I finish.

ENFRANCHISE
Definition: to grant the vote to
Synonym: empower
Sentence: The Nineteenth Amendment enfranchised women.

ENMITY
Definition: ill will, hatred, hostility
Synonym: hostility
Sentence: Mark and Andy have clearly not forgiven each other, because the enmity between them is obvious to anyone in their presence.

ENNUI
Definition: boredom, weariness
Synonym: tedium
Sentence: I feel such ennui that I don't look forward to anything, not even my birthday party.

ENTAIL
Definition: to include as a necessary step
Synonym: involve
Sentence: Building a new fence entails tearing down the old one.

ENTHRALL
Definition: to charm, hold spellbound; to captivate
Synonym: captivate
Sentence: The sailor's stories of fighting off sharks and finding ancient treasures enthralled his young son.

ENTICE
Definition: to tempt
Synonym: lure
Sentence: The advertisement enticed customers with promises of big savings.

ENTRENCH
Definition: to establish so firmly that change is unlikely
Synonym: embed
Sentence: The tradition was deeply entrenched in the culture.

ENUNCIATE
Definition: to speak clearly
Synonym: articulate
Sentence: Please enunciate so everyone can understand you.

EPHEMERAL
Definition: short-lived, fleeting; brief, short-lived
Synonym: transient
Sentence: She promised she'd love me forever, but her "forever" was only ephemeral: she left me after one week.

EPISTOLARY
Definition: relating to or contained in letters
Synonym: correspondence-based
Sentence: Some people call me "Auntie's boy," because my aunt and I have such a close epistolary relationship that we write each other every day.

EPITOME
Definition: a perfect example, embodiment; summary, a part which represents the whole
Synonym: embodiment
Sentence: My mother, the epitome of good taste, always dresses more elegantly than I do.

EPOCHAL
Definition: distinctive, memorable
Synonym: momentous
Sentence: The invention of the internet was an epochal event.

EQUANIMITY
Definition: composure; steadiness of mind
Synonym: composure
Sentence: Even though he had just been fired, Mr. Simms showed great equanimity by neatly packing up his desk and wishing everyone in the office well.

EQUIVOCAL
Definition: ambiguous, uncertain, undecided
Synonym: ambiguous
Sentence: His intentions were so equivocal that I didn't know whether he was being chivalrous or sleazy.

EQUIVOCATE
Definition: to avoid commitment, waffle
Synonym: hedge
Sentence: The politician equivocated when asked about his position.

ERRATIC
Definition: inconsistent, uneven, irregular, wandering
Synonym: unpredictable
Sentence: His erratic behavior concerned his friends.

ERSATZ
Definition: false, synthetic
Synonym: artificial
Sentence: The ersatz leather looked cheap.

ERUDITE
Definition: learned; learned, scholarly
Synonym: scholarly
Sentence: My Latin teacher is such an erudite scholar that he has translated some of the most difficult and abstruse ancient poetry.

ESCHEW
Definition: to avoid; to shun, avoid
Synonym: avoid
Sentence: George hates the color green so much that he eschews all green food.

ESOTERIC
Definition: understood by only a select few; known by only a few people, abstruse
Synonym: obscure
Sentence: Even the most advanced students cannot understand the physicist's esoteric theories.

ESPOUSE
Definition: to take up as a cause, support; to adopt, support a cause
Synonym: advocate
Sentence: I love animals so much that I espouse animal rights.

ETHEREAL
Definition: heavenly, exceptionally delicate or refined; heavenly
Synonym: celestial
Sentence: In her flowing silk gown and lace veil, the bride looked ethereal.

ETYMOLOGY
Definition: the history of words, their origin and development
Synonym: word origin
Sentence: From the study of etymology, I know that the word "quixotic" derives from Don Quixote and the word "gaudy" refers to the Spanish architect Gaudí.

EUPHEMISM
Definition: good saying, a nice way of saying something ugly
Synonym: mild expression
Sentence: "Passed away" is a euphemism for "died."

EUPHONY
Definition: good sound
Synonym: pleasant sound
Sentence: The euphony of the music was soothing.

EUPHORIC
Definition: elated, uplifted; really happy
Synonym: elated
Sentence: I was euphoric when I found out that my sister had given birth to twins.

EVANESCENCE
Definition: briefness
Synonym: transience
Sentence: The evanescence of the rainbow disappointed the children.

EVANESCENT
Definition: fleeting, momentary
Synonym: transitory
Sentence: My joy at getting promoted was evanescent because I discovered that I would have to work much longer hours in a less friendly office.

EVINCE
Definition: to show, reveal
Synonym: demonstrate
Sentence: Christopher's hand-wringing and nail-biting evince how nervous he is about the upcoming English test.

EXACERBATE
Definition: to make more violent, intense; to make worse
Synonym: worsen
Sentence: The gruesome and scary movie I saw last night exacerbated my fears of the dark.

EXALT
Definition: to glorify, praise
Synonym: glorify
Sentence: Michael Jordan is the figure in basketball we exalt the most.

EXASPERATE
Definition: to irritate, irk
Synonym: frustrate
Sentence: George's endless complaints exasperated his roomate.

EXCAVATE
Definition: to dig out of the ground and remove
Synonym: unearth
Sentence: The pharaoh's treasures were excavated by archeologists in Egypt.

EXCULPATE
Definition: to free from guilt or blame, exonerate
Synonym: exonerate
Sentence: My discovery of the ring behind the dresser exculpated me from the charge of having stolen it.

EXCURSION
Definition: a trip or outing
Synonym: outing
Sentence: After taking an excursion to the Bronx Zoo, I dreamed about pandas and monkeys.

EXECRABLE
Definition: loathsome, detestable
Synonym: abominable
Sentence: Her pudding is so execrable that it makes me sick.

EXEMPLARY
Definition: outstanding, setting a good example
Synonym: model
Sentence: Her exemplary behavior earned praise from teachers.

EXPEDITE
Definition: to speed up, make easier
Synonym: hasten
Sentence: We need to expedite the approval process.

EXPEDIENT
Definition: advisable, advantageous, serving one's self-interest
Synonym: practical
Sentence: In his bid for reelection, the governor made an expedient move by tabling all controversial legislation.

EXPIATE
Definition: to make amends for, atone
Synonym: atone
Sentence: To expiate my selfishness, I gave all my profits to charity.

EXPUNGE
Definition: to obliterate, eradicate; to erase forever
Synonym: erase
Sentence: Fearful of an IRS investigation, Paul tried to expunge all incriminating evidence from his tax files.

EXPURGATE
Definition: to remove offensive or incorrect parts, usually of a book
Synonym: censor
Sentence: The history editors expurgated from the text all disparaging and inflammatory comments about the Republican Party.

EXTANT
Definition: existing, not destroyed or lost; alive, in existence
Synonym: surviving
Sentence: My mother's extant love letters to my father are in the attic trunk.

EXTENUATE
Definition: to make less serious
Synonym: mitigate
Sentence: The circumstances extenuate his behavior.

EXTOL
Definition: to praise; to praise, revere
Synonym: praise
Sentence: Violet extolled the virtues of a vegetarian diet to her meat-loving brother.

EXONERATE
Definition: to free from guilt or blame, exculpate; to prove innocent
Synonym: vindicate
Sentence: The true thief's confession exonerated the man who had been held in custody for the crime.

EXORBITANT
Definition: excessive
Synonym: excessive
Sentence: Her exorbitant praise made me blush and squirm in my seat.

EXTRANEOUS
Definition: irrelevant, extra, not necessary; extra, non-essential
Synonym: superfluous
Sentence: Personal political ambitions should always remain extraneous to legislative policy, but, unfortunately, they rarely are.

EXTRICATE
Definition: to disentangle
Synonym: free
Sentence: Instead of trying to mediate between my brother and sister, I extricated myself from the family tension entirely and left the house for the day.

EXULT
Definition: to rejoice
Synonym: rejoice
Sentence: When she found out she won the literature prize, Mary exulted by dancing and singing through the school's halls.

FABRICATE
Definition: to make up, invent
Synonym: invent
Sentence: When I arrived an hour late to class, I fabricated some excuse about my car breaking down on the way to school.

FACADE
Definition: (1) the wall of a building (2) a deceptive appearance or attitude; face, appearance
Synonym: front
Sentence: Despite my smiling façade, I am feeling melancholy.

FACETIOUS
Definition: silly, humorous, said in jest
Synonym: joking
Sentence: His facetious comment was not appreciated.

FACILE
Definition: (1) easy, requiring little effort (2) superficial, achieved with minimal thought or care, insincere
Synonym: easy
Sentence: This game is so facile that even a four-year-old can master it.

FALLACIOUS
Definition: incorrect, misleading
Synonym: false
Sentence: Emily offered me cigarettes on the fallacious assumption that I smoked.

FALLACY
Definition: a false idea, not true
Synonym: misconception
Sentence: It's a fallacy that all snakes are poisonous.

FASTIDIOUS
Definition: meticulous, demanding, having high and often unattainable standards; picky
Synonym: meticulous
Sentence: Mark is so fastidious that he is never able to finish a project because it always seems imperfect to him.

FATHOM
Definition: to understand, comprehend
Synonym: comprehend
Sentence: I cannot fathom why you like that crabby and mean-spirited neighbor of ours.

FATUOUS
Definition: silly, foolish
Synonym: foolish
Sentence: He considers himself a serious poet, but in truth, he only writes fatuous limericks.

FAZE
Definition: to discourage, upset
Synonym: disturb
Sentence: The criticism didn't faze her.

FECUND
Definition: fruitful, fertile; fertile, rich, fruitful, prolific
Synonym: fertile
Sentence: The fecund tree bore enough apples to last us through the entire season.

FEIGN
Definition: to fake
Synonym: pretend
Sentence: She feigned illness to avoid the meeting.

FELICITY
Definition: happiness
Synonym: happiness
Sentence: They enjoyed a life of domestic felicity.

FELICITOUS
Definition: (1) well suited, apt (2) delightful, pleasing
Synonym: appropriate
Sentence: While his comments were idiotic and rambling, mine were felicitous and helpful.

FERAL
Definition: wild, savage
Synonym: wild
Sentence: That beast looks so feral that I would fear being alone with it.

FERVENT
Definition: ardent, passionate
Synonym: passionate
Sentence: The fervent protestors chained themselves to the building and shouted all night long.

FETID
Definition: having a foul odor; smelly, stinky
Synonym: stinking
Sentence: I can tell from the fetid smell in your refrigerator that your milk has spoiled.

FETTER
Definition: to chain, restrain; to restrain, chain, lock up
Synonym: restrain
Sentence: The dog was fettered to the parking meter.

FIASCO
Definition: disaster, mess
Synonym: disaster
Sentence: The party was a complete fiasco.

FICKLE
Definition: shifting in character, inconstant
Synonym: changeable
Sentence: In Greek dramas, the fickle gods help Achilles one day, and then harm him the next.

FIDELITY
Definition: loyalty, devotion; loyalty, accuracy
Synonym: faithfulness
Sentence: Guard dogs are known for the great fidelity they show toward their masters.

FIGURATIVE
Definition: symbolic
Synonym: metaphorical
Sentence: Using figurative language, Jane likened the storm to an angry bull.

FLABBERGASTED
Definition: astounded
Synonym: astonished
Sentence: Whenever I read an Agatha Christie mystery novel, I am always flabbergasted when I learn the identity of the murderer.

FLACCID
Definition: limp, not firm or strong
Synonym: limp
Sentence: If a plant is not watered enough, its leaves become droopy and flaccid.

FLAGRANT
Definition: offensive, egregious; obvious, conspicuous, glaring
Synonym: blatant
Sentence: The judge's decision to set the man free simply because that man was his brother was a flagrant abuse of power.

FLORID
Definition: flowery, ornate
Synonym: ornate
Sentence: The writer's florid prose belongs on a sentimental Hallmark card.

FLOUT
Definition: to disregard or disobey openly
Synonym: defy
Sentence: I flouted the school's dress code by wearing a tie-dyed tank top and a pair of cut-off jeans.

FLUCTUATE
Definition: to vary, change, come and go
Synonym: vary
Sentence: Stock prices fluctuate daily.

FLUENCY
Definition: smoothness or expertness in speaking or doing
Synonym: eloquence
Sentence: She spoke with fluency in three languages.

FOIBLE
Definition: weakness
Synonym: weakness
Sentence: Everyone has their foibles.

FOIL
Definition: to thwart, frustrate, defeat
Synonym: thwart
Sentence: Inspector Wilkens foiled the thieves by locking them in the bank along with their stolen money.

FORAGE
Definition: to graze, rummage for food
Synonym: search
Sentence: When we got lost on our hiking trip, we foraged for berries and nuts in order to survive.

FORBEARANCE
Definition: patience, restraint, toleration
Synonym: patience
Sentence: The doctor showed great forbearance in calming down the angry patient who shouted insults at him.

FORESTALL
Definition: to prevent, thwart, delay
Synonym: prevent
Sentence: I forestalled the cold I was getting by taking plenty of vitamin C pills and wearing a scarf.

FORLORN
Definition: lonely, abandoned, hopeless
Synonym: desolate
Sentence: Even though I had the flu, my family decided to go skiing for the weekend and leave me home alone, feeling feverish and forlorn.

FORMATIVE
Definition: shaping, creating
Synonym: developmental
Sentence: The formative years of childhood are crucial.

FORSAKE
Definition: to give up, renounce
Synonym: abandon
Sentence: My New Year's resolution is to forsake smoking and drinking.

FORTE
Definition: strength
Synonym: strength
Sentence: Math is her forte.

FORTITUDE
Definition: strength, guts
Synonym: courage
Sentence: Achilles' fortitude in battle is legendary.

FORTUITOUS
Definition: happening by chance, often lucky or fortunate; lucky
Synonym: fortunate
Sentence: After looking for Manuel and not finding him at home, Harriet had a fortuitous encounter with him at the post office.

FORUM
Definition: a medium for lecture or discussion
Synonym: platform
Sentence: Some radio talk-shows provide a good forum for political debate.

FOSTER
Definition: to stimulate, promote, encourage
Synonym: encourage
Sentence: To foster good health in the city, the mayor started a "Get out and exercise!" campaign.

FRACTIOUS
Definition: troublesome or irritable
Synonym: irritable
Sentence: Although the child insisted he wasn't tired, his fractious behavior—especially his decision to crush his cheese and crackers all over the floor—convinced everyone present that it was time to put him to bed.

FRAUGHT
Definition: (usually used with "with") filled or accompanied with
Synonym: laden
Sentence: Her glances in his direction were fraught with meaning, though precisely what meaning remained unclear.

FRENETIC
Definition: frenzied, hectic, frantic
Synonym: frantic
Sentence: In the hours between night and morning, the frenetic pace of city life slows to a lull.

FRIVOLOUS
Definition: of little importance, trifling
Synonym: trivial
Sentence: Someday, all that anxiety about whether your zit will disappear before the prom will seem totally frivolous.

FRUGAL
Definition: thrifty, economical; thrifty, stingy
Synonym: economical
Sentence: Richard is so frugal that his diet consists almost exclusively of catfish and chicken liver—the two most inexpensive foods in the store.

FURTIVE
Definition: secretive, sly; sneaky, secretive
Synonym: stealthy
Sentence: Jane's placement of her drugs in her sock drawer was not as furtive as she thought, as the sock drawer is the first place most parents look.

FUSE
Definition: to join together, unite
Synonym: unite
Sentence: The two companies fused to form one corporation.

GARISH
Definition: gaudy, in bad taste; gaudy, showy
Synonym: gaudy
Sentence: Mrs. Watson has poor taste and covers every object in her house with a garish gold lamé.

GARNER
Definition: to get, gather
Synonym: gather
Sentence: The film garnered critical acclaim.

GARGANTUAN
Definition: huge, gigantic, brobdingnagian
Synonym: enormous
Sentence: The gargantuan feast fed hundreds.

GARRULOUS
Definition: talkative, wordy; talkative
Synonym: talkative
Sentence: Some talk show hosts are so garrulous that their guests can't get a word in edgewise.

GAUCHE
Definition: clumsy, socially awkward
Synonym: tactless
Sentence: His gauche behavior at the dinner party embarrassed everyone.

GAUNT
Definition: thin
Synonym: emaciated
Sentence: The gaunt prisoner had clearly not been fed properly.

GENIAL
Definition: friendly, affable
Synonym: amiable
Sentence: Although he's been known to behave like a real jerk, I would say that my brother is an overall genial guy.

GLIB
Definition: smooth talking
Synonym: facile
Sentence: The glib salesman convinced many people to buy.

GLUTTONY
Definition: overindulgence in food or drink
Synonym: greed
Sentence: Ada's fried chicken tastes so divine, I don't know how anyone can call gluttony a sin.

GOAD
Definition: to urge, spur, incite to action
Synonym: provoke
Sentence: Jim may think he's not going to fight Billy, but Billy will goad Jim on with insults until he throws a punch.

GORGE
Definition: to eat to excess
Synonym: overeat
Sentence: He gorged himself at the buffet.

GOURMAND
Definition: someone fond of eating and drinking
Synonym: epicure
Sentence: My parents, who used to eat little more than crackers and salad, have become real gourmands in their old age.

GRANDILOQUENCE
Definition: lofty, pompous language
Synonym: pomposity
Sentence: The student thought her grandiloquence would make her sound smart, but neither the class nor the teacher bought it.

GRANDIOSE
Definition: on a magnificent or exaggerated scale
Synonym: extravagant
Sentence: Margaret planned a grandiose party, replete with elephants, trapeze artists, and clowns.

GRATUITOUS
Definition: uncalled for, unwarranted; unnecessary
Synonym: unwarranted
Sentence: Every morning the guy at the donut shop gives me a gratuitous helping of ketchup packets.

GREGARIOUS
Definition: drawn to the company of others, sociable; friendly, liking company, sociable
Synonym: sociable
Sentence: Well, if you're not gregarious, I don't know why you would want to go to a singles party!

GRIEVOUS
Definition: injurious, hurtful; serious or grave in nature
Synonym: serious
Sentence: Electrocuting the inmate without being sure of his guilt would be a truly grievous mistake.

GROVEL
Definition: to be humble, bow
Synonym: cringe
Sentence: He groveled at her feet, begging forgiveness.

GUILE
Definition: deceit, cunning, sly behavior; deceit, cunning
Synonym: cunning
Sentence: Because of his great guile, the politician was able to survive scandal after scandal.

GULLIBLE
Definition: believing anything, easily deceived
Synonym: naive
Sentence: The gullible tourist believed every scam.

HACKNEYED
Definition: unoriginal, trite; trite, stale, cliched, overused
Synonym: trite
Sentence: A girl can only hear "I love you" so many times before it begins to sound hackneyed and meaningless.

HALCYON
Definition: calm, peaceful
Synonym: peaceful
Sentence: We enjoyed halcyon days at the beach.

HALLOWED
Definition: revered, consecrated; holy, sacred
Synonym: sacred
Sentence: In the hallowed corridors of the cathedral, the disturbed professor felt himself to be at peace.

HAPHAZARD
Definition: random
Synonym: random
Sentence: His haphazard approach to studying was ineffective.

HAPLESS
Definition: unlucky
Synonym: unfortunate
Sentence: My poor, hapless family never seems to pick a sunny week to go on vacation.

HARANGUE
Definition: (1) a ranting speech (2) to give such a speech
Synonym: tirade
Sentence: Everyone had heard the teacher's harangue about gum chewing in class before.

HARDY
Definition: robust, capable of surviving through adverse conditions
Synonym: robust
Sentence: I too would have expected the plants to be dead by mid-November, but apparently they're very hardy.

HARROWING
Definition: greatly distressing, vexing
Synonym: distressing
Sentence: The car crash was a harrowing experience, but I have a feeling that the increase in my insurance premiums will be even more upsetting.

HAUGHTY
Definition: disdainfully proud
Synonym: arrogant
Sentence: The superstar's haughty dismissal of her costars will backfire on her someday.

HEDONISM
Definition: seeking pleasure
Synonym: pleasure-seeking
Sentence: His hedonistic lifestyle was unsustainable.

HEDONIST
Definition: one who believes pleasure should be the primary pursuit of humans
Synonym: pleasure-seeker
Sentence: Because he's such a hedonist, I knew Murray would appreciate the 11 cases of wine I bought him for his birthday.

HEGEMONY
Definition: domination over others
Synonym: dominance
Sentence: Britain's hegemony over its colonies was threatened once nationalist sentiment began to spread around the world.

HEINOUS
Definition: shockingly wicked, repugnant
Synonym: atrocious
Sentence: The killings were made all the more heinous by the fact that the murderer first tortured his victims for three days.

HERESY
Definition: an opinion opposed to established beliefs
Synonym: blasphemy
Sentence: His theories were considered heresy by the church.

HETEROGENEOUS
Definition: varied, diverse in character
Synonym: diverse
Sentence: I hate having only one flavor so I always buy the swirled, or should I say heterogeneous, type of ice cream.

HIATUS
Definition: a break or gap in duration or continuity
Synonym: interruption
Sentence: The hiatus in service should last two or three months—until the cable lines are repaired.

HIERARCHY
Definition: a system with ranked groups, usually according to social, economic, or professional class
Synonym: ranking
Sentence: Women found it very difficult to break into the upper ranks of the department's hierarchy.

HOMOGENOUS
Definition: of the same kind
Synonym: uniform
Sentence: The population was relatively homogenous.

HYPERBOLE
Definition: exaggeration
Synonym: exaggeration
Sentence: His claim that he could eat a million hot dogs was obvious hyperbole.

HYPOCRISY
Definition: pretending to believe what one does not; phoniness, insincerity
Synonym: insincerity
Sentence: Once the politician began passing legislation that contradicted his campaign promises, his hypocrisy became apparent.

HYPOTHETICAL
Definition: supposed or assumed true, but unproven
Synonym: theoretical
Sentence: Even though it has been celebrated by seven major newspapers, that the drug will be a success when tested in humans is still hypothetical.

HYPOTHESIS
Definition: educated guess
Synonym: theory
Sentence: The scientist tested her hypothesis through experiments.

ICONOCLAST
Definition: destroyer of tradition (breaker of icons); one who attacks common beliefs or institutions
Synonym: rebel
Sentence: Jane goes to one protest after another, but she seems to be an iconoclast rather than an activist with a progressive agenda.

IDIOSYNCRATIC
Definition: peculiar to one person; highly individualized
Synonym: peculiar
Sentence: I know you had trouble with the last test, but because your mistakes were highly idiosyncratic, I'm going to deny your request that the class be given a new test.

IDOLATROUS
Definition: excessively worshipping one object or person
Synonym: worshipful
Sentence: Xena's idolatrous fawning over the band—following them on tour, starting their fan club, filming their documentary—is really beginning to get on my nerves.

IGNOMINIOUS
Definition: humiliating, disgracing
Synonym: shameful
Sentence: It was really ignominious to be kicked out of the dorm for having an illegal gas stove in my room.

IGNOMINY
Definition: shame
Synonym: disgrace
Sentence: He suffered the ignominy of public humiliation.

ILLICIT
Definition: forbidden, not permitted
Synonym: illegal
Sentence: The fourth-grader learned many illicit words from a pamphlet that was being passed around school.

IMMERSE
Definition: to absorb, deeply involve, engross
Synonym: engross
Sentence: After breaking up with her boyfriend, Nancy decided to immerse herself in her work in order to avoid crying.

IMMINENT
Definition: about to or likely to happen very soon
Synonym: impending
Sentence: The storm is imminent.

IMMUTABLE
Definition: not changeable; can't be changed, not mutable
Synonym: unchangeable
Sentence: The laws of physics are immutable and constant.

IMPALPABLE
Definition: can't be touched
Synonym: intangible
Sentence: The ghost was impalpable.

IMPARTIAL
Definition: unbiased, neutral
Synonym: fair
Sentence: The judge remained impartial throughout the trial.

IMPASSIVE
Definition: stoic, not susceptible to suffering
Synonym: unemotional
Sentence: Stop being so impassive; it's healthy to cry every now and then.

IMPECCABLE
Definition: exemplary, flawless; without sin, flawless, perfect
Synonym: flawless
Sentence: If your grades were as impeccable as your sister's, then you too would receive a car for a graduation present.

IMPECUNIOUS
Definition: poor
Synonym: poor
Sentence: I fear he's too impecunious to take me out tonight.

IMPEDIMENT
Definition: obstacle
Synonym: obstacle
Sentence: His stutter was an impediment to public speaking.

IMPERATIVE
Definition: (1) necessary, pressing (2) a rule, command, or order
Synonym: essential
Sentence: It is imperative that you have these folders organized by midday.

IMPERIOUS
Definition: commanding, domineering; demanding, like an emperor
Synonym: domineering
Sentence: The imperious nature of your manner led me to dislike you at once.

IMPERTINENT
Definition: rude, insolent; rude
Synonym: insolent
Sentence: Most of your comments are so impertinent that I don't wish to dignify them with an answer.

IMPERVIOUS
Definition: impenetrable, incapable of being affected
Synonym: resistant
Sentence: Because of their thick layer of fur, many seals are almost impervious to the cold.

IMPETUOUS
Definition: rash; hastily done; hasty, rash, thoughtless
Synonym: rash
Sentence: Hilda's hasty slaying of the king was an impetuous, thoughtless action.

IMPINGE
Definition: (1) to impact, affect, make an impression (2) to encroach, infringe
Synonym: infringe
Sentence: The hail impinged the roof, leaving large dents.

IMPLACABLE
Definition: incapable of being appeased or mitigated; without mercy
Synonym: unappeasable
Sentence: Watch out: once you shun Grandma's cooking, she is totally implacable.

IMPLEMENT
Definition: (1) an instrument, utensil, tool (2) to put into effect, to institute
Synonym: tool
Sentence: Do you have a knife or some other sort of implement that I could use to pry the lid off of this jar?

IMPLICATE
Definition: to involve in an incriminating way, incriminate
Synonym: involve
Sentence: Even though Tom wasn't present at the time of the shooting, he was implicated by the evidence suggesting that he had supplied the shooters with guns.

IMPLICIT
Definition: understood but not outwardly obvious, implied
Synonym: implied
Sentence: I know Professor Smith didn't actually say not to write from personal experience, but I think such a message was implicit in her instruction to use scholarly sources.

IMPLY
Definition: to suggest, hint
Synonym: suggest
Sentence: Are you implying that I'm wrong?

IMPOVERISH
Definition: to make poor
Synonym: bankrupt
Sentence: The drought impoverished the farmers.

IMPREGNABLE
Definition: resistant to capture or penetration
Synonym: invincible
Sentence: Though the invaders used battering rams, catapults, and rain dances, the fortress proved impregnable and resisted all attacks.

IMPROPRIETY
Definition: not proper, lacking propriety
Synonym: indecency
Sentence: The impropriety of his behavior shocked everyone.

IMPUDENT
Definition: casually rude, insolent, impertinent
Synonym: insolent
Sentence: The impudent young man looked the princess up and down and told her she was hot even though she hadn't asked him.

IMPUNITY
Definition: immunity from punishment
Synonym: exemption
Sentence: He acted with impunity because he knew he wouldn't be caught.

IMPUTE
Definition: to ascribe, blame
Synonym: attribute
Sentence: The CEO imputed the many typos in the letter to his lazy secretary.

INADVERTENT
Definition: without intention; accidental
Synonym: accidental
Sentence: The inadvertent error caused confusion.

INANE
Definition: silly and meaningless; stupid
Synonym: foolish
Sentence: Some films are so inane that the psychology of the characters makes absolutely no sense.

INARTICULATE
Definition: incapable of expressing oneself clearly through speech
Synonym: unclear
Sentence: Though he spoke for over an hour, the lecturer was completely inarticulate and the students had no idea what he was talking about.

INCARNATE
Definition: (1) existing in the flesh, embodied (2) to give human form to
Synonym: embodied
Sentence: In the church pageant, I play the role of greed incarnate.

INCESSANT
Definition: unending; unceasing, never-ending, non-stop
Synonym: continuous
Sentence: We wanted to go outside and play, but the incessant rain kept us indoors for two days.

INCENDIARY
Definition: (1) a person who agitates (2) inflammatory, causing combustion
Synonym: inflammatory
Sentence: If we catch the incendiary who screamed "bomb" in the middle of the soccer match, we're going to put him in jail.

INCHOATE
Definition: unformed or formless, in a beginning stage
Synonym: rudimentary
Sentence: The country's government is still inchoate and, because it has no great tradition, quite unstable.

INCISIVE
Definition: clear, sharp, direct; precise, focused
Synonym: penetrating
Sentence: The discussion wasn't going anywhere until her incisive comment allowed everyone to see what the true issues were.

INCLINATION
Definition: a tendency, propensity
Synonym: tendency
Sentence: Sarah has an inclination to see every foreign film she hears about, even when she's sure that she won't like it.

INCOGNITO
Definition: not known, in disguise
Synonym: disguised
Sentence: The celebrity traveled incognito to avoid fans.

INCOMPETENT
Definition: ineffective, klutzy
Synonym: inept
Sentence: The incompetent worker was fired.

INCONGRUOUS
Definition: not fitting, inconsistent
Synonym: incompatible
Sentence: His formal attire was incongruous at the beach party.

INCONTROVERTIBLE
Definition: indisputable
Synonym: undeniable
Sentence: Only stubborn Tina would attempt to disprove the incontrovertible laws of physics.

INCORRIGIBLE
Definition: incapable of correction, delinquent; uncorrectable, beyond help
Synonym: irredeemable
Sentence: You can buy Grandma nicotine gum all you want, but I think that after sixty-five years of smoking she's incorrigible.

INCREMENTAL
Definition: gradual, by stages or increments
Synonym: gradual
Sentence: Progress was slow but incremental.

INCREMENT
Definition: an enlargement; the process of increasing
Synonym: increase
Sentence: The workmen made the wall longer, increment by increment.

INCUMBENT
Definition: (1) one who holds an office (2) obligatory
Synonym: officeholder
Sentence: The incumbent senator is already serving his fifth term.

INDEFATIGABLE
Definition: incapable of defeat, failure, decay
Synonym: tireless
Sentence: Even after traveling 62 miles, the indefatigable runner kept on moving.

INDIGENOUS
Definition: originating in a region
Synonym: native
Sentence: Some fear that these plants, which are not indigenous to the region, may choke out the vegetation that is native to the area.

INDIGENT
Definition: very poor, impoverished
Synonym: poor
Sentence: I would rather donate money to help the indigent population than to the park sculpture fund.

INDIGNATION
Definition: anger sparked by something unjust or unfair
Synonym: outrage
Sentence: I resigned from the sorority because of my indignation at its hazing of new members.

INDOLENT
Definition: lazy
Synonym: lazy
Sentence: Why should my indolent children, who can't even pick themselves up off the couch to pour their own juice, be rewarded with a trip to the mall?

INDOMITABLE
Definition: not capable of being conquered
Synonym: unconquerable
Sentence: To be honest, Jim, my indomitable nature means I could never take orders from anyone, and especially not from a jerk like you.

INDUBITABLE
Definition: undoubtable, genuine
Synonym: certain
Sentence: The evidence was indubitable.

INDUCE
Definition: to bring about, stimulate
Synonym: cause
Sentence: Who knew that our decision to boycott school lunch would induce a huge riot?

INEPT
Definition: not suitable or capable, unqualified; incapable, clumsy
Synonym: incompetent
Sentence: She proved how inept she was when she forgot three orders and spilled a beer in a customer's lap.

INEXORABLE
Definition: incapable of being persuaded or placated; inevitable, unstoppable, relentless
Synonym: relentless
Sentence: Although I begged for hours, Mom was inexorable and refused to let me stay out all night after the prom.

INEXTRICABLE
Definition: hopelessly tangled or entangled
Synonym: inseparable
Sentence: Unless I look at the solution manual, I have no way of solving this inextricable problem.

INFAMY
Definition: notoriety, extreme ill repute; famous in a bad way
Synonym: disgrace
Sentence: The infamy of his crime will not lessen as the decades pass.

INFIDEL
Definition: faithless person, heretic, traitor
Synonym: nonbeliever
Sentence: The crusaders called their enemies infidels.

INFUSION
Definition: an injection of one substance into another; the permeation of one substance by another
Synonym: injection
Sentence: The infusion of Eastern religion into Western philosophy created interesting new schools of thought.

INGENIOUS
Definition: clever, resourceful; clever, original
Synonym: inventive
Sentence: Her ingenious use of walnuts instead of the peanuts called for by the recipe was lauded by the other garden club members who found her cake delicious.

INGENUITY
Definition: cleverness
Synonym: inventiveness
Sentence: His ingenuity solved the problem.

INGENUOUS
Definition: not devious; innocent and candid; innocent
Synonym: naive
Sentence: He must have writers, but his speeches seem so ingenuous it's hard to believe he's not speaking from his own heart.

INHIBIT
Definition: to prevent, restrain, stop; to restrain, control
Synonym: hinder
Sentence: When I told you I needed the car last night, I certainly never meant to inhibit you from going out.

INIMICAL
Definition: hostile, enemylike; not friendly
Synonym: hostile
Sentence: I don't see how I could ever work for a company that was so cold and inimical to me during my interviews.

INIQUITY
Definition: wickedness or sin
Synonym: wickedness
Sentence: Your iniquity will be forgiven.

INITIATE
Definition: to begin
Synonym: start
Sentence: He initiated the project.

INJUNCTION
Definition: an order of official warning
Synonym: order
Sentence: After his house was toilet-papered for the fifth time, the mayor issued an injunction against anyone younger than 21 buying toilet paper.

INNATE
Definition: inborn, native, inherent; inborn, inherent, not learned or acquired
Synonym: inherent
Sentence: His incredible athletic talent is innate, he never trains, lifts weights, or practices.

INNOCUOUS
Definition: harmless, inoffensive; harmless, insignificant
Synonym: harmless
Sentence: In spite of their innocuous appearance, these mushrooms are actually quite poisonous.

INNOVATE
Definition: to do something in an unprecedented way; to introduce, create
Synonym: pioneer
Sentence: Because of the stiff competition, the company knew it needed to pour a lot of energy into innovating new and better products.

INNUENDO
Definition: an insinuation
Synonym: insinuation
Sentence: During the debate, the politician made several innuendos about the sexual activities of his opponent.

INOCULATE
Definition: to introduce a microorganism, serum, or vaccine into an organism in order to increase immunity to illness; to vaccinate
Synonym: vaccinate
Sentence: I've feared needles ever since I was inoculated against 37 diseases at age one; but I have also never been sick.

INQUISITOR
Definition: one who inquires, especially in a hostile manner
Synonym: questioner
Sentence: The inquisitor was instructed to knock on every door in town in order to find the fugitive.

INSATIABLE
Definition: incapable of being satisfied; cannot be filled or satisfied, bottomless pit
Synonym: unquenchable
Sentence: My insatiable appetite for melons can be a real problem in the winter.

INSCRUTABLE
Definition: hard to figure, unreadable, poker faced, enigmatic
Synonym: mysterious
Sentence: His inscrutable expression gave nothing away.

INSIDIOUS
Definition: appealing but imperceptibly harmful, seductive
Synonym: treacherous
Sentence: Lisa's insidious chocolate cake tastes so good but makes you feel so sick later on!

INSINUATE
Definition: to suggest indirectly or subtly; to imply
Synonym: imply
Sentence: I wish Luke and Spencer would stop insinuating that my perfect report card is the result of anything other than my superior intelligence and good work habits.

INSIPID
Definition: dull, boring; bland, lacking flavor, boring, stupid, vapid
Synonym: bland
Sentence: The play was so insipid, I fell asleep halfway through.

INSOLENT
Definition: rude, arrogant, overbearing; rude
Synonym: impudent
Sentence: That celebrity is so insolent, making fun of his fans right to their faces.

INSTIGATE
Definition: to urge, goad; to start, initiate, begin
Synonym: provoke
Sentence: The demagogue instigated the crowd into a fury by telling them that they had been cheated by the federal government.

INSULAR
Definition: separated and narrow-minded; tight-knit, closed off
Synonym: isolated
Sentence: Because of the sensitive nature of their jobs, those who work for the CIA must remain insular and generally only spend time with each other.

INSURGENT
Definition: one who rebels
Synonym: rebel
Sentence: The insurgent snuck into and defaced a different classroom each night until the administration agreed to meet his demands.

INTEGRAL
Definition: necessary for completeness
Synonym: essential
Sentence: Without the integral ingredient of flour, you wouldn't be able to make bread.

INTEMPERATE
Definition: wild, excessive, not moderate
Synonym: excessive
Sentence: His intemperate drinking concerned his family.

INTER
Definition: to bury
Synonym: bury
Sentence: The body was interred in the cemetery.

INTERJECT
Definition: to insert between other things
Synonym: interrupt
Sentence: During our conversation, the cab driver occasionally interjected his opinion.

INTERLOCUTOR
Definition: someone who participates in a dialogue or conversation
Synonym: conversationalist
Sentence: When the officials could not come to an agreement over the correct cover of the flags, the prime minister acted as an interlocutor.

INTERMINABLE
Definition: without possibility of end
Synonym: endless
Sentence: The interminable summer heat was unbearable.